A friend made a reservation for our party of 10.  I arrived with the entourage, and as soon as we entered through the glass door, we were led to our table and seated.   The ambiance is impressive and chic. If you order a 3-course meal (including dessert), you get $4 off.  So I gave that a shot.  For antipasti, I tried the Tonnato Tonno (ahi tuna) - I really don't know what this is supposed to be like - morsels of ahi tuna in a tangy Italian sauce - but it was interesting, and the tuna was fresh. For the secondi, I chose the 16 oz. NY strip steak (+$16), medium.  This was a rather substantial amount of steak.  It was pre-sliced into 5 fat slices.  Tender and moist, but not terribly flavorful without the pepper au jus sauce that comes on the side.  It came with roasted jalapeno peppers that were not spicy hot at all... very good. For dessert, I tried the Matcha Matcha Man - green tea rice pudding.  It came with a fortune cookie that was more a ribbon of pastry.  I'm a fan of rice pudding, so the hints of green tea with each spoonful were interesting. All in all, I thought the food was good, but it didn't knock my boots off.  Worth a try, but probably would not repeat.
I always feel bad leaving a poor review on Yelp, but I can't lie... I can't even get myself to leave 2 stars because the food was that bad... I didn't even finish my meal. So I came here with a deal for a prix fix. When we got there the server told us the deal for the prix fix is actually a taster prix fix aka smaller portions.... we didn't really care since we were too hungry. We got two starts two entrees and two desserts. It was annoying being told a lot of the items on the menu are out and it was actually another fish or another protein instead. For our starters we got two carpaccio dishes. The fish was fresh and good but both dishes were over saucy. The massive amount of sauce drizzled on top took away the freshness of the fish. We were eating sauce rather than fish. For our secondi I got the halibut and the bf got the duck breast. My halibut was DRY... how can a Four Season's Restaurant overcook fish??? It was so dry that when my fork goes in to cut off a piece it wouldn't break-off without a lot of force. After forcefully getting a piece of the fish, it would crumble... =( I was super sad my fish was so dry and under flavored. The duck on the other hand was delicious. The skins was glazed very nice and the breast was cooked medium. I was super excited about desserts since it sounded delicious: ricotta cheesecake with mango and strawberries and italian donuts with Guinness chocolate and sea salt caramel. To my dismay, this was not a memorable or even good way to end our meal. I couldn't even finish my cheesecake. The presentation was lovely. Four squares of cheesecake with a square of crust resting on the side. So taste wise, definitely not as nice as the visuals. The cheesecake was not creamy nor sweet... it crumbled in your mouth and the crust taste comparable to a stale thick graham cracker. I was thoroughly disappointed. The italian donuts were not bad but again nothing memorable. Compared to my cheesecake they were great but let's not compare mediocre with terrible. Anyway I wish I had a good experience, the decor was LOVELY! The service was great, seated quickly and greeted... but I think our server realized I didn't like our meal and didn't even ask how things were going. I didn't even finish my entree and didn't even finish my dessert as well. I would have appreciated it if our waitress took notice to our experience. Yes we got a groupon deal but that should not decrease our service. Actually even with our groupon we ended up paying $100 plus for a crappy meal. We ended our experience laughing that at least we didn't have to pay the original price for a bad meal.
Everything is perfect. You won't have to worry about stupid trashy loud tards in their forever 21 outfits spilling their drinks on you here. Ever. They recently added the burger meal to their menu. Must try. Addition to their cocktails. And their 4 course dinners. Check the menu+the chef before you go though. Last time; it was a lot of raw beef. Not everyone's cup of tea. But it's a MUST. esp. if you are around the area. Enjoy!
Even if you're not part of the exec-set, Quattro is appealing all the same. With a modern-yet-warm ambiance, exquisite service, and an impeccably-dressed crowd, its great for a quick glass of wine at the bar - power hour style - or an elegant date night. Staying for dinner? I rarely order fish as an entree, but the black cod from Quattro was amazing. Like butter, even. Uh. May. Zing. I also hosted an informal event here a couple years ago and the staff took great care of us. Even better - It's inside the gorgeous Four Seasons Hotel. Now that it's summer, I highly recommend dinner/drinks, then staying the night, and spending the day at their pool. Perfect.
Came here for a business lunch.  Was greeted quickly and seated right away.  Very efficient which is great for lunch. The lunch menu was limited and amazingly enough, I didn't see anything I wanted other than the pizza.  I opted for the Italian sausage / caramelized onion pizza / flat bread.  Delicious. We ended up sitting around and talking until 2pm but was not at all rushed.  Service was friendly but not intrusive.  Not sure if I would choose this place for lunch given the limited lunch selection but if someone suggests to meet here, I wouldn't mind all that much.
I bought a Travelzoo deal and since the expiration date was getting close, my husband and I decided to go on a weekday instead of the weekend. Since there was no one to watch our toddler last night, we brought him along with us. The ambiance of the place is nice. Windows all around so you get the natural lights coming down. There is also a patio area if you wanted to eat outside. Now when I made my reservation, I didn't include my toddler. Since he's still small, we just have him sit on our laps. So when we arrived, the hostess was going to make us wait for a table but at dinner time, it was a bit packed. She told us that there was a booth and we told her that was totally fine. It was big enough. The thing I did notice later on was that there was no children that was my son's age (2 and a half years). The children there were a bit older. Maybe they were concerned that he would act up or something. They gave my toddler a coloring book, crayons and a beanie baby key chain. I've never seen any restaurants give a key chain before. After our night was over, our waitress said that our toddler was very well behaved (which he was). Anyway so onto dinner. Emily (our waitress) told us that the dishes were like a tasting menu. Basically, think small portions. With the Travelzoo, we got 2 antipastis, 2 secondis, 2 dolcis and two sparkling wine. Now on their menu, they do have a 3-course for $45 or 4-course for $60. The service was good and Emily was attentive. She remembered our orders and made sure that none of our dishes had nuts because our son has a nut allergy. So I got the Tonno Tonnato (pacific albacore tuna/green onion/capers/garlic chips), kobe-sytle masami beef (kohlrabi fondant/torepedo onion/cherry glace/black pepper jus) and mocha almond fudge "sundae". Everything was good. The antipasti Tonna Tonnato had a tang to it, which might have been the capers. My husband got the chilled pea soup (snap peas/toasted bionche/spice creme fraiche), organic chicken (meyer lemon confit/fennel/taggiasche onion) and the ricotta cheese cake (prosecco/strawberry salad). He liked everything but the dessert. He thought the dessert was so-so. My toddler liked the organic chicken. Emily told me that the chef wanted us to know that the desserts were exposed to nuts so instead, we got a bowl of fruits for him (which was $5). Now you're probably wondering about the bill. Well, it is expensive there if you had what we had last night.. Each course has it's own fix price on the menu and the menu does say which one has an additional price. Ex. all the secondi food are $29, except the kobe-styled masami beef which is $9 more ($38). Wine was $32 and water was $6.50 (not tap water). So without the Travelzoo deal, it would have been $162.92 (this included the tax only). With the Travelzoo deal ($65 for a $120 value) we had $27.55 left over so instead the total came out to be $51.55 (with tip). Overall, we had a good experience. It's a good place for small groups and dates. I would come again with friends.
Outside one pretty awful appetizer, the meal was solid and the waitstaff were professional. I would rate the meal at 3.5 stars, but since they professional, I'll bump it up to four stars. Like many other procrastinators, I used my Travelzoo voucher. I had: Salmon crudo: very good flavors all around, would recommend and eat again. Hawaiian Ono (Wahoo): quite a few pieces of fish with two large shrimp in a tomato based sauce. Very filling and hearty. I think Ono has a meatier texture so if you are expecting flaky and delicate - best to probably not have this. Bombolini: about 6-7 small friend and sugared donut holes with chocolate and salted caramel dipping sauce on the side. This was very well done. The donuts were light, fluffy, hot and not oily and the dipping sauces were very complimentary. My friend had: Tuna tonno: AVOID. The tun was fine, but the sauce over it was oversalted. Should have sent back Chicken: my friend thought the chicken and heirloom tomatoes and vegetables were very good. Another sizeable portion. Personally, I thought it was moist, but an ultimately rather boring dish. Tiramisu: very good, would recommend if you like tiramisu. Not a very traditional wedge cake presentation though. Since I don't drink, I gave my dining partner the two alcoholic beverages. He tried the Prosecco (interestingly, the J sparkling wine was not offered - has better online reviews) and the waitperson suggested that he could substitute a glass of wine instead of a second glass of sparkling wine. My friend got a glass of pinot noir over dinner. I ended up drinking a $4.50 iced tea (at least it included refills). Do note that if you want to have tap water - ask for tap water or they will charge you for "still" water. I think that is not very professional. Thank you to previous Yelp reviewers for alerting me to this tactic. Verdict: Really would give the restaurant 3.5 stars overall. The three-course $45 option is not a bad value. I would like to try Sunday supper for the limited three-course for $25.
The vibe of the dining area is hip and modern. W-esque and not what you'd expect from a four seasons. The scene - a lot of people dining probably on the company's dollar. Music and noise level - LOUD. THe service spectacular and not stuffy. But the food was simply meh from a simple steak to shrimp. I could do better out of my own kitchen. Probably a better bar experience than dining... If they could improve upon the food, i'd definitely go back.
Single ladies! Or Not! You like men in suits? Or to quote Abby S. "well groomed" men? Search no more. They gather here! It feels like a place where deals are made. I've been to a conference here but never to Quattro. Even the name sounds like a sleek sports car. Wait- it is. Reminiscent of the Audi. Hmmm...sleek indeed. Came with Teresa P for lunch and our usual weekly catch up chat. She had the Prosecco and I had a Riesling. Yes we drink for lunch:) Shared a club sandwhich that was really good! Service was fast and friendly. I love the little nooks where you can sit, relax and sip your choice of wines from their list. I love my Riesling. It was as what the server said-far from being dry. This was one of Teresa P's many places her hubby took her to for one of those special nights. And she turned around and took me! Hot! Lol! I'm lucky to be have my senses intrigued by Teresa P again. Salud! Woman! Feel better! Thanks for another intro again!
i was impressed with their consolidated but solid cocktail menu at their lounge and bar! About 10 drinks to choose from, all at a pricey tag of $15, but all crafted to perfection. They also offer olives/nuts to snack on in the lounge, great complement to the drinks! The dining room here is always pretty consistent and Quattro also participates in "Dine About Town" so if you want to try it on a budget, it's good to take advantage of that promotion. They offer Breakfast, Lunch, Dinner and "Intermezzo" - a menu with appetizers and Hors d'oeuvres to snack on in between lunch & dinner or post-dinner. Great for small groups, dates, business meetings.
Overall the food quality is good. However, the service and business practices are outright horrible and unprofessional. The service, in an empty restaurant, took us about 15 minutes get water. Once that was finally delivered and the food arrived, we noticed there was no silverware on the table with no servers in sight to help us out. The worst part about this place is the business practice. We had a gift card that we were told expired, however, being in California that is not possible. They said they would confirm with their finance department that it was never used, and they would be able to apply the gift card value to our bill, but would require us to put down a credit card which would be refunded once the gift card was processed. We were informed the next day that would not honor that agreement and would charge our credit card the full amount. In addition to the restaurant manager not honoring her verbal agreement, she has not returned any phone calls. Disappointed in this restaurant and the management for making promises and not following through on their agreements.
I usually don't go to those kind of restaurants. Too fancy, too expensive. But it was my birthday and my bosses invited me. The service was very friendly - as expected:) And the food was delicious!! So good. The portions are pretty small and the food is expensive but it's really good. I had the organic chicken breast with those sweet cambray onions, asparagus and some yellow creme stuff, I can't remember the name of and it's not the online menu. OMG so yummy! The paninis looked good and everyone liked it and the parmesan fries were good too. They also have yummy dessert.
After a foodie Saturday, I found myself coming to enjoy quiet and relaxing meal. We ordered 2 antipastis, 2 secondis, 2 dolcis and two sparkling wine. Antipastis: * Tonno Tonnato (pacific albacore tuna | green onion | capers | garlic chips) * Chilled Spring Pea Soup (snap peas| toasted brioche | spiced creme fraiche) Secondis: * Kobe-Style Masami Beef +$9 (kohlrabi fondant | torpedo onion | cherry glace |   black pepper jus) * Salmon - (do not recall how it was prepared) Dolcis: * Tiramisu (cocoa | mascarpone | espresso) * Orange Creamcicle (vanilla anglaise | spiced rhubarb compote) It was a nice meal to enjoy on a summer evening. Might come back with friends.
I've had their Sunday brunch, breakfast, lunch and their bar food several times over the course of the last couple of years and all I can say is that everything about this place is just blah.  The service is good, but not great considering it's a restaurant w/in a Four Seasons.  Same goes for their food - nothing I've had has been terrible, but they weren't so great or exceptional either.  Nothing stands out as in the second you walk out, you forget what you just had - very forgettable food.  I'd say that the place is great for grabbing drinks and getting some small plates at the bar.
Had a lovely evening tonight with my girlfriend at Quattro. Located just off the 101 (at the University Ave. exit), the University Circle development is a beacon greeting cars off of the freeway. As you walk through the lighted circle into the restaurant, everything feels comfortable and inviting. This trend continues in the restaurant, where upholstered couches and chairs are preferred over conventional dining chairs. Everything inside the restaurant feels modern and opulent, from the life-sized sculptures against the wall to the blown glass vases placed in their own specially-carved recesses in the wall. Service is extraordinarily attentive and fast; it won't be long after you've completed one course before the next course is delivered to your table. Everything is prompt, and the servers are very effervescent and seem to care about their patrons, checking in to make sure everything was prepared to their liking. The bread came out first, which was nothing to complain about! Two different breads came in the bread basket, one of which was toasted, and the other one was light and fluffy. It was served with olive oil and balsamic vinaigrette for dipping. For the rest of our meal, we ended up doing the three course tasting menu with sparkling wine. The sparkling wine came out first, and I got the J Vineyards rose, while my girlfriend got the Drusian Prosecco. The rose was the better of the two, and had a nice fruitiness to it with a mild acidic finish. The prosecco was drier, and had a milder, flowery flavor to it. As we continued sipping on our sparkling wines, out came the antipasti! I ordered the fennel soup, which was just exceptional. It was made from a blood orange gelee, toasted brioche, and a Sicilian fennel seed (the menu also said salsa cruda, although I didn't see or taste that, but who knows?). It really had a wonderful flavor that was somehow savory, sweet, and spicy all at the same time. My girlfriend got the carne cruda piemontese, which came with ciabatta crostini (Italian-style toasted ciabatta bread) on which you could spread a meat patty made from veal tartare, truffled porcini mushrooms, and lemon. I wasn't as crazy about this, but I'm usually not crazy about the earthy flavor of mushrooms. That said, my girlfriend (who is much more of a mushroom lover) agreed that my fennel soup was the better appetizer. For our secondi, I got the Angus beef rib-eye, which was made with a sauce from a 16 year Lagavulin scotch; it was then topped with a celeriac (celery root) and carrot puree, along with shallots on the side. The steak was good enough, although the flavor was milder than I expected, and nothing really brought the flavor of the scotch out. My girlfriend got the grouper agghiotta, which was a grouper and white prawns served in a red sauce ("agghiotta") made from San Marzano tomatoes (plum tomatoes), orange olive oil, and a variety of vegetables. The grouper in the agghiotta sauce was definitely the highlight of all of our dishes; it had a wonderful, spiced flavor to it that was just excellent, brimming with flavors. That said, I wasn't as crazy about the prawns in the agghiotta sauce; it was harder to taste the agghiotta flavor amidst the very large, meaty prawns. For our final (dolci) course, we ordered the orange creamcicle and chocolate tortino. The creamcicle was a panna cotta with the traditional orange and vanilla flavors; it was then topped with a vanilla anglaise sauce. It had a very nice, sweet flavor to it that was just excellent. I wasn't as crazy about the chocolate tortino (molten chocolate cake), although it was also good. If you like chocolate, you will really like the chocolate-covered chocolate that is the molten chocolate tortino. It is covered in chocolate sauce, served with four raspberries, and then placed with a scoop of hazelnut ice cream on the side. Although I wasn't crazy about the chocolate tortino, I WAS crazy about the hazelnut ice cream! What a great flavor, which certainly complemented the chocolate very well! Overall, Quattro was an enjoyable experience! I'd recommend it if you're in the area, and are looking for something Italian influenced, but is different from its other Italian counterparts in the most creative and fun way possible! You'll get all of that, along with some great flavors and a nice comforting ambiance at the Four Seasons' Quattro Restaurant.
The manager contacted me regarding my experience and he said he would look into implementing some changes. I greatly appreciate that management takes the time to respond to customers.
Amazing desserts, which is a big deal to me b/c dessert is my favorite part of the day. I highly,... Read more 
This review is for the BAR: After deciding to avoid downtown Palo Alto on a Saturday night, we spontaneously stopped at the Four Seasons Bar, Quattro, for a night cap. The valet kindly parked the car for us, even though we were not guests. The best part about that was when we retrieved the car at the end of the night, they remembered my bf's name/car without even asking. That is top notch service right there. I've never had that happen before at any establishment. Good job. The bar area is long with a few lounge seats in the front of the bar. If you walk past the bar you'll reach the open dining room of the restaurant. Beautiful place. I'll have to check that one one of these days. We ordered a couple of cocktails which were great. We also decided on some dessert and chose the cheesecake. Super delish. The bartender was super nice. Offered us some fresh fruit that was in season that they were using for specialty drinks. Highly recommend this bar for a drink if you want to escape the rest of the nightlife in the area. Beautiful property and decor. You'll receive top notch service as expected from any Four Seasons. Highly recommend.
My darling luvah took me to the Four Seasons for a Valentine's bed/breakfast weekend and we dined at Quattro Sat night and had brunch the next morning. The decor is beautiful and service is impeccable but the food was not as impressive. A few of our dishes came out lukewarm. Dinner: Notables - Lobster Risotto - rich, dynamic flavor but the rice was a tad undercooked. - Raviolli stuffed with smoked sausage - Delicious. Well-cooked and bursting with flavor - Italian donut w/melted chocolate and salted caramel sauce - The salted caramel was dip was great but everything was again..lukewarm. - Ribeye - cooked perfectly, great cut but...yes...they let it rest too long before serving..Argh. The dinner service was outstanding. Pierre, our friendly server was very knowledgeable about the menu and  made some outstanding recommendations. The bussers were very efficient. Brunch: Notables - Quattro Benedict - Delicious. The bread that the poached egg and shaved parma were served on was great. Again...the meal was barely warm. Potatoes were almost cold. Mimosas were not good. They used cheap champagne and low quality orange juice. Brunch service was excellent. Our server was very attentive, warm and helpful. Bottom Line: Dinner & Brunch were memorable only for the great service and my delicious date. Wouldn't go out of my way to come back.
$25 for a three course meal? Sign me up!  The Sunday Supper indeed was a fantastic deal. My gf and I agreed that the starters were the highlight of the meal.  A great wedge salad amazing sausage flatbread (I'll let you guess who ordered what.)  The mains were a bit heavy and only so-so (pesto-infused pasta and a lamb dish), but the desserts (sponge cake type dish and apple crepe) were delectable. Service was efficient and cordial, but I don't really understand why the servers rotated throughout the entire meal.  I can't really complain since everyone was friendly and helpful, but it just seemed strange that random waiters that we had never seen before would stop by asking if everything is alright. Overall, the Sunday Supper deal is highly recommended!
When asked about where the best spot in Palo Alto for a meeting or party is, I automatically think of The Four Seasons and the restaurant there, Quattro.  As someone who plans a lot of meetings, I appreciate an organized and communicative staff, which you will find there.  Rich(Beverage Director), Rob(Catering Manager), Marco(chef), and Nicole(PR) are a phenomenal team to work with if you want to host a fun, stress-free, yet impressive event. The chef specializes in regional Italian cuisine made from local, fresh ingredients and is willing and happy to customize menus for specific tastes and for your budget.  Ditto of the beverage director.  Friends and colleagues seem surprised when I suggest the Four Seasons, asking me "Isn't that expensive"?  However, I've found that within a reasonable budget, the team at the Four Seasons will go out of their way to accommodate you. This is in contrast to the lack of value you might receive at other luxury hotels nearby.  Rob, with catering is great at interpreting your wishes in terms of the ambiance for your specific purpose whether it is a business function, or personal celebration.  From an event held last May, we still get happy comments regularly from guests who attended an event 10 months ago, on everything from the food to the layout, and so on. What we had: Asparagus Soup-Divine, perfect Quinoa Salad-healthy and delicious Chicken Cacciatore-hearty Rigatoni Bolognese-house made pasta noodles, need I say more? Dessert-they can do "healthy" Panna cotta/fruit combo options or choose from a variety of more traditional desserts. I was just asked today "Where should we have our meeting" and without pause, I said "The Four Seasons" so hence, this review.
Ate there a few weeks ago.  Kind of a let down as compared to a year ago.  Staff was rushed,  food quality so so and menu limited.  Only one fish (salmon) and one steak (sirloin).  I expect more from this place based on reputation but mostly price! Wine guy is exceptional though.
Does not honor it's TravelZoo coupons.  Basically a dishonest business.
This is review is for Sunday Supper, amazing value for $25.  Food an service were 4 stars considering the price.  For the December menu, get the bean soup - fantastic!  The green lasagna is misleading, it actually bolognese with wide green homemade pasta and cheese, it too was outstanding.  The restaurant is a bit "cold" feeling, so if you're looking for a cozy, romantic spot, probably stick near the bar, instead of the dinning room.  Sundays tend to draw families, so also expect some kid action (which is not bad, but somewhat loud, running around etc). Will be coming back for Sunday Supper again!
Awesome place to fine dine at.  You get your money's worth.  Comfortable posh classy setting. Nice place for a celebration of an event.  The food was excellent.  Service was great.  Definitely come back when I am in town.
I have stayed at Four Seasons all over the world, with my particular favorites being the George V in Paris, the 4 Seasons in Milan (its an old convent) and, third, in Prague. There is something special about the experience and their restaurants are no exception.  Living in SF I have lunch at Seasons at the 4 Seasons here a lot. I had a business lunch recently on the peninsula and chose Quattro, at the 4 Seasons Palo Alto, because of its easy access on/off the 101 freeway, and because it communicates a particular style, elegance and professionalism, at least the other 4 Seasons restaurants do.   I considered setting up the lunch at Rosewood but I hoped the 4 Seasons would be more consistent. I read some of the other yelp reviews and I was a bit put off.  Seems some expected the French Laundry and others seemed bitter for a variety of reasons.  But I was not disappointed in the least; rather, everything was great.  The service was impecable - Anton in the bar, Lily at the reception desk and Emily at our dining table.  The food was excellent - organic, tasty and architectural. I will most definitely go back even if for just a drink in the bar with the cheese crisps and sun dried tomato paste.  And maybe the specialty drink Anton named for our group.  I really appreciate how he, and the other pro staff, remembered our names. Besides, I feel regal there.
Great service.  Professional and classy ambiance. Sizable and tasty breakfast dishes, but strikingly small lunch and dinner entrees.  I just paid $29 for a tiny sliver of halibut. Not a lot of value when it comes to entrees here. The food tasted fine, but the size and quality of the dishes do not match the prices. Go here for drinks or breakfast, and elsewhere for lunch and dinner.
Been here for several business lunches.  I even had a job interview here once- sadly, I didn't get the job, but I got a great brunch out of it! Impress your date, clients, boss or business associates by ordering off the menu - the Black Truffle Parmesan Fries are only offered through the hotel's room service menu, but they would gladly make them for you if you ask.  They are my best kept secret here - well, I guess not any more. I loved how our server came back and asked, "Are the Truffle fries as you like them, miss?"  "Why, yes. Yes, they are, thank you very much, Miguel!" as I coyly read our server's name tag.  :::cue boss' nod of approval here::: You get a well deserved cuatro stars from me, Quattro!
I have been ruminating over writing this review for the last 2 hours - 1.5 hours while I was actually there having dinner and the 30 minutes it took to drive home. The first 10 minutes at this restaurant ruined my mood for the rest of dinner and trust me, it was NOT a good mood! My family and I made reservations for Quattro's sunday evening $25 3 course dinner for my mother's birthday. My mother, who is turning 58 and having her third breast cancer surgery in two days. We decided to come here to celebrate her. Being a good daughter, I bought her little cakes for the occasion. My fiance and I arrived and I set the cakes on the table. The hostess asked if we wanted to put them in the fridge for now and oh, BTW, there's a $3 cutting fee for all cakes, per serving that was being cut. I explained that they were just little slices of cake and that we wouldn't need them to cut it for us. She said okay and took the box to the kitchen. Not 5 minutes later, the waiter comes up to me and asks if I was the one with the cakes, he inquires as he is holding the box of pastries. I say yes and he informs me that the restaurant has a no outside food policy and usually they charge $9 per piece of outside food brought it. So with the 5 little pieces of cake I brought in, they would have to charge me $45. Basically he said he could take the box of pastries back to the kitchen and charge me the $9/piece of cake or I could take it back to the car and leave it there because the restaurant has its own pastries and bringing in outside ones is undermining the restaurant's food. Did I mention that NOWHERE did I see any sign or statement saying there was a no outside food policy? This is where my mood went from celebratory to sour. When people decide to eat at a fine dining establishment, they are usually not trying to pinch pennies. I was not bringing in my own cakes so I wouldn't have to purchase their desserts. I brought it because that's what people usually do when they eat out for someone's birthday - they bring a frickin' cake. I did it because my mother would've enjoyed it. PLUS everyone at dinner was already planning on ordering Quattro's 3 course menu, which includes their damn dessert anyway, so it's not like we were planning on skipping dessert to eat our own! I sincerely expected more from Four Seasons restaurant than an ultimatum to either pay $45 for $13 worth of pastries or to take that shit back to my car. Anyway, I ended up taking it back to the car. The rest of the 3 courses of dinner were spent with my best celebratory face on but I know I came off as extremely rude. Whatever. They were rude to me so I am rude back. The kicker is the 3rd course came around and it was bread pudding. Everyone got a piece because we all ordered the 3 courses. Then the restaurant had the audacity to bring my mother a SECOND piece of bread pudding with a single candle and "Happy Birthday Mom" on it. Seriously? You just served my mother a second piece of the SAME EXACT dessert right after she just ate a piece of that same damn dessert! I think it was safe to assume that the restaurant didn't even have other dessert options available, yet they STILL did not allow me to bring in little pieces of cake for my mom's birthday. Why they were making sure a big frickin' deal over those stupid pieces of cake and then making themselves look ridiculous by trying to come off as thoughtful is beyond me. Needless to say, I was shocked and so turned off by this gesture. Anyway if you're looking to find a nice restaurant to celebrate a birthday, a graduation, an anniversary, or Valentine's day, DO NOT COME HERE. Apparently, celebrating is not okay.
Service: 4 stars. Maybe a little slow, but warm, efficient service matched with just enough attention. Food: 2.5 to 3 stars depending upon the dish. The vast majority of diners around us were also redeeming the travelzoo offers of $65 for a three course dinner for two with sparkling wine (valued at $120). The regular price for a 3 course dinner is only $45, so with the voucher, each glass of sparkling wine is valued at $15.  While we expected a markup on the wine, this made the offer's intrinsic value seem a tad inflated. Just a rose or prosecco was available. We may return for the regular special Sunday dinner prix-fixe at just $25 per person and skip their wine offerings or BYOB. Food is hit and miss. Appetizers: The grouper carpaccio was not really carpaccio because it was not cut or pounded thinly (which is what makes it carpaccio). Rather it was served a bit like sashimi, as they were very sizeable chunks of fish.   Just because the fish is served raw doesn't mean it's carpaccio style.  Also, the skin was left on, which made it very chewy. The veal tartare came with a creamy sauce. Though a tasty and satisfying appetizer, the sauce was on the rich side for our tastes. Entrees: The duck, which incurred a small surcharge, so we hoped it would be worth it.  Alas, 'tis not to be. They left the silver skin on! This is egregious. Made the dish a tad disappointing, as it's both difficult to cut through or even attempt to chew through. The sturgeon seafood stew fared better, though the fish was a bit overcooked. However, the shrimp and clams were perfectly cooked. Dessert: tiramisu was fine.  The bomboloni (small Italian donuts) are served with two dipping sauces of a very true chocolate sauce that's bitter and not very sweet at all, alongside a rich and salty caramel sauce.  Didn't make up for some of the earlier marginal dishes. Finally, the intimate seating for two is quite snug only due to the table's bottom base taking up most of the floor space between the cozy sofas for one-type seating.  Panes of frosted glass separate the booths from an adjacent area for tables seating four or more. Smartly designed seating arrangement makes the restaurant appear larger than it is, but also lends a hint of privacy. A full house means it gets noisy.  If one really has to dine at a hotel restaurant, perhaps wait for the high tea season at the Palace Hotel in downtown SF or Bourbon Steak at the Westin SF. There is plenty of free parking.
Where do I even start?!  Let me first say the wine was amazing.. never had such expensive wine before. Dessert white wine... Wow. So many layers.  Tasted like apple juice at first, then had a sparkle, then had that winey WINE taste, then was really sweet, then was STILL fruity... It didnt taste like alcohol because that (usually) sharp, biting, strong punch of alcohol wasnt strong at all.  AMAZING. What was it called again.. I took a picture of one of the bottles... Wow. Cant wait to try others. Get the 3-4 course meals... You get to try a lot.  Oh I forget all of the names... Dont feel like looking everything up but I dont want to butcher all the food with my bad english. I was warned that the chicken liver pate was really savery and strong, but it was good........ Reminded me of when I was young and always wanted the liver from the chicken...but my mom would forget and just throw it out.  Anyways---- the sturgeon (fish) was wrapped in bacon and light I guess. The dessert looked like chocolate lava cake.. but i forget the name. Well, my favorite part of the meal was the wine.  And its not even Napa.  I wonder what Napa will be like when I finally go there (and do the intended purpose of wine tasting). Wow cant wait.  I love wine now.  NO MORE BEER.
My husband and I had a great dinner at Quattro! The restaurant staffs did an extraordinary job for my birthday dinner such as custom menu and complimentary special birthday dessert etc.  Especially, the restaurant assistant manager, Aleksandra Wozniak, provided outstanding warm welcome and service.  Plus, the food was amazing. Quattro, A+++.
Simply put...Perfection! It's a nice, classy, safe location! They have many other events during the holiday season, check it out. *Lunch has been my only experience.
After a long work-related trip, I headed to Quattro with some reading for a relaxing dinner for one.  The staff members were amazing - working together seamlessly.  My water glass was never more than half empty, and my waiter Calvin brought me the dessert wine list early when I expressed interest in it so a glass was ready right after my entree plate (wiped clean of any trace of food) was whisked away. I started with the heirloom tomato salad, with a oozy creamy burrata, balsamic, and pesto.  It was a perfectly composed dish.  Part way through it I decided I didn't want cheese with my pasta dish, so I let Calvin know.  My entree was a little delayed, and both Calvin and the waiter who dropped off the entree apologized.  Apparently my no-cheese request didn't get to the kitchen in time, so they remade the dish without cheese.  I didn't mind waiting, since the staff let me know the reason for the delay, but Quattro offered me a dessert free of charge.  By the way, the olive parpadelle with duck ragout had a rustic feel, with homemade pasta that was pleasantly hearty.  I had the smaller portion option, which was just the right size (especially for a multicourse meal). For dessert, I paired my Cockburns port with the coconut panna cotta.  When the dessert first arrived as a martini-glass-sized portion, I was feeling regretful for ordering it.  Regret went out the window with the first bite.  The panna cotta was the perfect consistency (quivering in the spoon, literally!), and light.  The mango sorbet managed to stay frozen even though I took my time polishing off the last course. At the end of my meal, I felt relaxed and full of taste memories.
Came here once again this time for dinner.  Upgraded to 5 stars because I did not have a single complaint throughout the whole dinner.  We booked a reservation through open table for 4.  We had 2 travel zoo coupons for the prix fixe meal of one appetizer, one entree, one dessert and glass of champagne each.  The ambience was perfect.  Lively but not too loud where we couldn't hear each other.   Since I couldn't drink alcoholic drinks, they allowed me to sub a virgin bloody mary for the glass of champagne.  Quite delicious once again (love the spiciness of this bloody mary!).  I started off with the chilled split pea soup.  This was the best of the night ! Colors were vibrant and taste was excellent.  I loved the pickled veggies in the soup as well.  Secondly, I got the halibut.  This was also cooked perfectly, the almond couscous added a special touch and the the raisin added sweetness to a salty dish.  Overall very healthy and fresh tasting. My husband got the kobe beef and was not disappointed either!  I tried it as well and found it tender and flavorful.  Lastly for dessert, I got the Bombolini (fried italian donut).  This was VERY good as the donuts are fried freshly and just melt in your mouth.  Came with salted caramel dipping sauces... wish i could have taken it to go ! Overall, I really enjoyed my evening here and will come back again for special occasions =)
I came here for Sunday Brunch one day when we were feeling kinda baller... ok ok we had a gift... Read more 
Attention Single Women: This is a hot spot for single, well-groomed men. Seriously, my gal pal and I were the only females here for happy hour on Monday evening. And no, we didn't go there with the intention of hooking a man, either. Chris the bartender took great care of us, showing off the Yelp Drinks specials and even serving a tasty cocktail, The Cardinal Sin, that is no longer on the drink menu. Of course we weren't sitting there long when a man approached us and asked to buy us a drink. We were apprehensive at first, but then realized that we could easily leave at any point. And frankly, out of all the men that were staring at us, he was at least brave enough to come up and attempt to chat it up. Or at least he was interested in chatting up my female counterpart ;) A few glasses of wine later, we had made a new friend. Well, at least we just wanted to be friends. He might have had other ideas on how to spend our evening, but we weren't having it. Quattro is absolutely gorgeous inside and out! If I were rich and powerful in Palo Alto, I'd be here a lot. A girl can dream, right?
I'm usually not a big fan of hotel restaurants, but I had a good value on the tasting for two from bloomspot for $79.  I didn't have super high expectations, but I was hoping for a little more. As for parking, there is free self parking or valet.  Once you walk in, the restaurant is to the right. The interior is very clean and modern, with high ceilings and tables that are spaced out nicely.  Outside, there's a beautiful patio that's still very sleek, nice for brunch or a summer dinner when it's not super windy. Wines by the bottle were actually 15% off that night, but we stuck to cocktails, of which I'd recommend the lemon one with sparkling wine (Sgropinno). We did the tasting, which was what the bloomspot deal was good for, which was unfortunately was not subject to substitutions. I guess I've been spoiled by other tastings where you start with an amuse, but all we got was foccacia and a sourdough-ish french bread. We started with house-made braseola, which was a little too salty even for my tastes.  It was served over a dressed arugula salad with pickled purple onion and thin shavings of parmesean. Next was the seafood risotto, which wasn't as creamy as your typical risotto.  The rice itself was warm, but the seafood atop was cold.  The acid from the lemon in the seafood actually cuts through the risotto nicely, but personally, risotto is not a dish I like cooled down. For the main course, we had duck, which was slightly underdone (fat still visible under the skin, skin not fully crisped).  I'm actually not a big duck person, but I didn't have much choice.  The accompaniments were very enjoyable, though, with an apricot puree, a roasted cipollini onion, and chantarelles.  The highlight of that dish was the purple cabbage, which tasted like bacon. The final course was a peach upside down cake with a pistachio ice cream, which was actually my favorite course.  I'm not big on sweets, but the caramelized outside of the cake was done nicely, and it was a nice take on the traditional pineapple version. Our server was very enthusiastic and friendly, but I was expecting a bit more from our experience at the Four Seasons.  Even though the manager came by to check in with the main course, our risotto actually arrived arrived without any introduction at all - the plates were just placed in front of us.  Food otherwise came out at a pretty good pace without too much wait time in between. For people staying at the hotel, it's nice to have an in house option with a good bar.  Unfortunately, even with the bloomspot deal, I don't think it was worth it.
My 1st visit & won't be my last a bit pricey but well worth the money luckily my Grandpa paid!!! Staff is very professional ,attentive & make it a pleasurable experience 4 all. I ordered the Huevos Rancheros which included black beans,avocado,salsa picante & 2 tortillas "Sunday Breakfast" plates average around $14 the food tasted delightful & was served with very little wait. I tried a piece of my Grandmother's French Toast & it was bombtastic(Very Yummy)!!!!!! Give it a try c  watcha think I recommend it but prolley monthly oppose to weekly cause de prices mite break ur wallet... Hell if  u don't like I'll buy u breakfast!!!!!!!
This was my first visit & won't be my last.  A bit pricey but well worth the money. The decor is very modern and the service staff is very professional, attentive & make it a pleasurable experience. I would highly recommend this restaurant!  Very flavorful and beautiful dishes.
*********************** REVIEW 432 ************************ Located inside the Four Seasons Hotel Palo Alto, open spacious place, with decent seasonal menu, but limited. Great cocktail list, decent wine list and service. We came in on a weekend early evening. They serve 3 types of brads, fresh baked. My folks and I ordered: - Veggies soup - OK. - Summer Vegetable Salad -fresh & light dressing. - Octopus Stew - super yummy, savory, filling! - Smokey Oregon Blue Cheese Fig Jam - nice touch to pair with wine. - Toy Box Tomatoes, Basil, Roasted garlic - I love this to the presentation! - Linguini Fruiti de Mare - Mom enjoyed it much. - Griliata Mista Trio of Pork Loin, Sausage & Chicken - dad loved this dish too! - Chocolate Soufle - excellent, dad praised it! - Tea serves with Biscotte & honey Cute Fench Press Tea Pot, remind me of Cafe Sua Da, Vietnamese style! Mom wanted to take the pot home haha! Oh & they have the biggest & longest pepper shaker ever !
I ate here for the new Saturday luncheons they offer. I attended the Kate Spade Luncheon at Quattro last weekend. It was pretty great. Bottomless champagne is always a pleasure. I had a watermelon soup, grilled swordfish and some delightful little dessert. Beautiful presentation and a good time!
I've frequented Quattro about a half dozen times for brunch with my man, making it one of our favorite weekend spots to start the day. Sometimes we are nice enough to take along his parents and on one occasion my mom when she was visiting from Germany. The ambiance is great with amazing decorations. Whether it's the handmade colorful vases on one wall, the extensive lighting architecture in the room or the giant cement slabs behind a glass wall that are hollowed out with various human shapes, I always have something to stare at while I wait for my food. The host is very friendly and efficient, always asking if you'd like your coat to be taken and the waiters are equally attentive.They have that certain know-how here when to leave you alone for a while and when to be a little more present. We generally try to order at least one new dish on their seasonally changing menu, but are always happy to stick to a couple of our favorites that fortunately have not yet been removed from the selection. Our all-time winner is definitely the scrambled egg pizza. Thin crust slices of heaven topped with sundried tomato, Italian sausage and mozzarella topped with juicy scrambled egg for breakfast - who doesn't want that? A few weeks ago we shared the pizza and the smoked turkey club, which was served on deliciously fresh rosemary focaccia with applewood smoked bacon, avocado and tomato. The sandwich was accompanied by crispy parmesan french fries. If you have a sweet tooth in the morning, I recommend their lemon strawberry pancakes or their amazing French toast with mascarpone. Their mimosas and bellinis are priced a little to steep for my taste, so we usually order the fresh juice of the day, which is always to die for. Last time it was a blend of bananas, peaches and strawberries if I remember correctly. I've always left here stuffed and happy.
While I've had many a business breakfast here (and it's a great place to do so, centrally located on the Peninsula and right off 101), I had dinner here for the first time the other night and boy was it good. The decor is beautiful, the ceiling is high (think:  not noisy) and the room, which is surrounded with glass walls, is light and airy. I thought the food was outstanding: I had the roasted asparagus salad with poached egg, then a risotto with morel mushrooms, and finally the Angus rib eye.  My friends were equally happy with their meals. The service was outstanding and they were reasonable on the corkage which, since we were doing a wine-tasting dinner, was important to us -- particularly the lack of a limit of the number of bottles.  (We were going to Tamarine but they refused to budge on a two-bottle corkage limit for a party of six.) The downsides are the portion sizes and the prices.  I had felt rather gluttonous ordering three courses at the onset, but was very happy I did in the end.  All that adds up and when you throw in corkage on six bottles of wine and a few cheese plates to finish, we spent around $180/person.
This is a posh lounge/bar/restaurant where late night drinks seem to be the popular choice if you're attending an event in the Four Seasons complex. Decor is slick, hip, and clean in deep, rich browns. The bathrooms are classic Four Seasons style. My only complaint is that they recently switched their plush, cloth towels for the thick, paper towels : ( The service is top-notch, whether you're seated at their fully stocked bar, or at the long and high tables by the windows, or in their lounge on the comfy chairs or couches by the modern fireplace. Their wine selection is pretty good and delicious. The mixed drinks pack a punch, and are presented elegantly. Plus, their never-ending bowl of olives are really addictive! Big Plus: When their lounge and bar area was at capacity, they were nice enough to seat our party of 16 in the restaurant area, despite the fact that it was just for drinks and appetizers. Tip: Ask the hostess, not the wait staff, for your free Wi-Fi code. It's a teeny, tiny slip of paper, so don't lose it in the dim lighting of the bar!
Great place to make an impression whether it is for business or a date. The crowd is well heeled and this is a good place to be seen. It is the 4 Seasons but it is still a restaurant in a hotel. The ambience and service is great but the food is just so-so. The beef was  a little too chewy. I had the rum cake which was liberally doused with rum. It was pretty good but a little too rich for me. I ended up not finishing it which is a rarity for me.
Food was decent, but I wasn't blown away.  For a fine dining restaurant I would have hoped for something more. My husband and I actually were going because we were hoping to get some beignets, but they don't offer beignets on their menu anymore. That was a big disappointment. The service was great and we couldn't have asked for a better waiter.  He was really accommodating and even offered to ask the chef if they could make us beignets for dessert. They couldn't, but it was nice of him to inquire. Dinner consisted of: Rabbit Terrine - A good appetizer with nice flavors. Pork Ragu Lasagnette - Flavors were definitely there and the small plate size was perfect size. Pasta was a little too al dente to the point where I felt like it was just plain undercooked. My husband had the Ribeye - cooked to perfection and perfectly seasoned no complaints there. Tiramisu for dessert - It was a good dessert that tasted like tiramisu, but I really prefer the good old fashioned tiramisu with lady fingers and the whole nine.  This was a reinterpreted tiramisu which tasted good, but maybe I was just still disappointed about not getting beignets. Cocktails - Made up almost half our bill even though we took advantage of the Yelp 1/2 off drink specials.  We definitely enjoyed the cocktails. Overall, it's a great place for drinks.  Food is hit or miss, but I wouldn't write them off completely. The service is great and it's a beautiful restaurant.
This is my 10th visit to this beautiful restaurant and it gets better and better. Today, I had lunch with a friend (I usually come here during dinner times) and this place is well managed, clean and have professional staffs on board. the waiter today was polite, friendly and came by perfect timing to refill our water and wine. Food always comes out perfectly. Where u seat the guess, waiter brings u the bread and the beverages. I love this place and this is my favorite restaurant to get out and enjoy the high quality food u deserve from a high class hotel. P.s. if u want to impress ur first date, trust me, bring them here during dinner times, where the lighting is warm, ambient and perfect mood setting.
Four Seasons???? I think not. I have been to many 4 seasons around the world, but none with service or food of this poor quality. I recently had a Travelzoo voucher to Seasons, the restaurant at 4 Seasons SF, and had a really great meal there. What you would expect from a 4 Seasons. So, I received a Travelzoo voucher for quattro and was expecting the same experience. The service was very slow to the point that it was getting frustrating. The food itself was pretty bad. The best thing was the starters. We got the Baby Beet Salad and Spicy Tuna Loin, which were both pretty good. We then got the cannelloni which was average. I didn't like the smokey taste in it. For the entree we got the Orata Bream and Angus Beef Rib Eye. The bream was overcooked and was fishy. Didn't taste fresh at all. It is served as a whole fish, but they cut it in half and pan sear it. It was so dry and fishy. Pretty bad. The Rib Eye was cooked perfectly at medium rare. I didn't enjoy the sauce they had on it though. For dessert we got the tiramisu and and mocha almond fudge sundae. The tiramisu was horrible and so was the sundae. I don't know why they call it a sundae, there wasn't any ice cream on it. We took 1 bite and threw the plates in front of us. I almost never don't finish a dessert, so it has to be pretty bad for me to just throw it in the middle of the table. We got our bill and then a random server came up to us and asked us how our meal was. I told him it was ok, nothing special. He then said I could tell on your facial expression that you didn't enjoy it. Let me call the manager. The manager comes and asks why we didn't enjoy our meal. We explained everything I said above. I gave her an example of a good fish at a local restaurant (Evvia and Dia Dekka). She didn't know either of the restaurants. Evvia is like 1 mile from this location. That's pretty bad if she doesn't even know her competition. She then gives us her business card and is like if you want to have lunch some other time just send me an email and I'll take care of you. Why would I come back for lunch? Come on now. Never going back there!
What a delightful experience!  Friend got hookups to this restaurant and invited me to enjoy along with her =) Monday night- had to walk through the small crowded bar to get to the dining area.  But once there the space was open and big with great ambiance.  Seated right away in a cute little booth for two seat- coat checked (great service!) Not a large selection of food but a good variety.  The selection of wine on the other hand is both varietal and plentiful! yay! Ended up deciding to share a caesar salad,  a pasta, and the rib eye along with a bottle of wine. - Wine was from Tusan- a light red and perfect smooth taste - Caesar salad- quiet tasty with just the right amount of sauce, cheese, everything - Pasta- wow so flavorful!  On the heavier taste side but because the pasta portions are all appetizer sized, this was the perfect amount. - Rib eye- perfect.  Got it medium rare and it was super perfectly cooked.  Full of flavor, tender, and just the right amount to round off our meal. Service was great!  Everyone super polite, attentive to cleaning off dishes and keeping the wine glass filled. I would loooove to come again but hey we don't get hook ups every day! I will add on that extra star when they decide to lower their prices a bit....pretty please?  =P
Fine dining at its best: wonderful ambiance, phenomenal food and extremely gracious service. I was more than impressed with my dining experience at Quattro last night, during their once monthly Osteria Night. In fact, I was so impressed that it actually brought me to tears. Has food ever been so good that it made you cry? Me neither, until last night. This was my first time dining at Quattro, and also the first time I'd ever been inside the gorgeous Four Seasons in East Palo Alto. Who would have ever thought "Four Seasons" and "East Palo Alto" would be heard in the same sentence? I must have driven by this Four Seasons over a hundred times, but never thought to stop in. But last night, as I walked towards the entrance of the restaurant, peeking over at the outdoor terrace with a water wall and long open fireplace, I felt like I was somewhere in the Hollywood Hills. The decor is sleek and modern, with all the upscale elegance associated with any Four Seasons hotel, but none of the pretentiousness. Last night, Chef Alessandro Cartumini created an amazing four course rustic Italian menu using seasonal ingredients with an emphasis on asparagus paired with 3 wines from Lucia Vineyards of Santa Rosa, a Rose, Chardonnay and Pinot Noir. Winemaker Gary Pisoni was dining at the table behind us, and he went around greeting guests and answering questions. Chef Cartumini came out to greet us at the end of our meal, which was when I was crying. I can't explain why I was crying - it could have been the combination of mind-blowing food and wine, it could have been because I hadn't had such an earth-shattering dinner in weeks, it could have been because it was Friday. Who knows, but I'm sure the chef was really confused. Our menu consisted of: Starter: - Jumbo Asparagus gratin - Soft Poached Organic egg, Bottarga (poached for 6 hours at 150 degree heat) - Squid ink angel hair pasta with Hawaiian blue tiger prawn spiedino - Saffron white asparagus mantecato Main: - Szechwan pepper seared Alaskan halibut - English peas, baby white asparagus (grown in Washington with limited distribution) - Whole roasted buffalo tenderloin (so buttery soft) - Lardo wrapped purple asparagus, parmesan spuma Dessert: - Lemon thyme ice cream - Asparagus and strawberry salad, spiced spuma Ok, with all those delectable dishes in one sitting, wouldn't you cry too? That's what I'm sayin'. Make your dinner reservation for the 2nd Friday of every month, Osteria Night is where it's at in PA.
Been here for lunch a few times.  Generally better for an expense account; very pleasant atmosphere, good service and high quality food.   During my most recent lunch we had a dungeness crab salad and appetizer portion of the mixed greens, and then the sweet pumpkin risotto and the delicious Parma ham thin crust pizza with cheese and arugula. Excellent meal. The staff checked in on us several times to make sure we were okay.
Unprepared I have entered a den of cougars.  At least a hundred of them, watching, licking their chops (and or dentures). Since I had a brief stint as a cougar hunter, I know what to look for, how to defend myself, and when to lay low to avoid contact.  I know my enemy.  I know her well.  I know her laugh, i know her smell, i know that piercing stare from those creepy pre-glaucoma eyes.  Keep cool Archie.  Maybe they wont notice. Unfortunately the two non-cougars accompanying me to dinner are only attracting attention from the dominant herd. To my left I see two cougars dining on the carcass of a Kleiner Perkins VC while to my right I see one stalking a Google exec.    I see a poor bastard from Intel taking the bait on the oldest cougar trap in the book.  The dreaded OTCB (Over Tanned Cleavage Bomb).  Like a moth to the hypnotic lights of a bug zapper, he walks with drinks in hand toward the predator. The cougars have laid all the traps on the easy prey of the Four Seasons Hotel.  The carnage around me is hard to watch but I am hungry and ready for a meal and thus far, have managed to stay below the cougar radar.  A few of the weaker cougars notice but I know how to defend myself. Dinner comes quickly and the waiters seem to walk briskly.  It's almost like they have been pinched in the ass one too many times.  Poor guy, he isn't cougar prey but they like to toy with him.  It keeps their stalking skills sharp. Appetizers and entrees are all superb.  The appetizer plate of various meats and cheeses is plentiful and tasty.  The duck is cooked perfectly.  Pressed to order again I would get the gnocchi.  I start to relax but remain on guard.  This is dangerous territory. Dessert is silly - four cinnamon sugar doughnuts served hot with chocolate sauce. Dinner is cut short...we are alone and out numbered. We make our way to the door when the unthinkable happens. My fake Cartier watch has been spotted. I run.
The Mrs. and I came here recently with another couple who are, no doubt about it, the most discerning of the people in our world who would actually admit to being our friends.  It was a get-a-sitter on a Saturday night; let's go act like civilized grown ups. I really like the decor and vibe in this space, and my wife commented that it has a LA loungy vibe.  You can take that to mean that it was dimly lit and seductively appointed with a modern atmosphere (i.e. no cheesy music). The menu mixes exotic (buffalo, boar, etc), with more accessible options (chicken, hanger steak).  We started with cocktails and the ladies had very festive Don Julio raspberry margaritas while I stuck with a gin martini after being outed by my wife as having a tendency to order fruity drinks like lemon drops.  (The waiter gamely tried to find an umbrella for my drink, but spared me the embarrassment and pretended that he couldn't find one.) The food was genuinely excellent across the board, made only better with the extravagant and voluptuous red wine chosen (and paid for!) by our generous dining companions.  I had home-made pasta with a buffalo ragu (tasty and lean) and I couldn't tell you what anyone else had, because I was so satisfied with my choice I forgot to look up. I did notice that the portions were pretty modest in size, but don't take this as a complaint, as if we're being honest, fine dining is about quality over quantity.  Still, if you're dropping some Jackson's to eat, you certainly don't want to go home hungry. For dessert, I had an artisan cheese selection that came with honeycomb, dried fruit and other incredible accoutrement.  A gorgeous way to top off a lovely meal and wonderful evening spanning nearly 3 hours. The service was terrific - friendly, knowledgeable and supportive (you know, the kind with a *gasp* actual opinion when you ask for one?). Note:  EXCELLENT expense account option for you boon-dogglers out there.  For cheapskates like me, a good option would be landing here for a night cap and cheese plate for dessert while soaking up the vibe and watching at all of the Silicon Valley executive types.
CULINARY MAGIC WONDERLAND . . . Edward, Edward, Edward . . . you are too amazing for words. This was my second time eating dinner here (won't be my last) and I am still blown away by Edward Higgins' mastery of the food arts. He just knows how to pair food together, balancing authentic flavors and yet teasing the palette with twists and turns. For example, the veal tartare crostini. Say what?! I have been schooled (please see picture). I didn't know such heavenly veal bliss even existed. Thank you, Edward. You have enlightened me and some. My personal all-time favorite was the toasted brioche and almonds in garlic butter with almond sorbet which was as amazing as it sounds. Who knew bread and sorbet can go well together and it did! The tomato gazpacho was also fantastic. Super SUPER fresh. I can NEVER get enough of the pastas here. Had the smoked bucatini with cabbage, fontina and mushrooms and it was just incredible. I was daydreaming of Italy while eating. The hybrid striped sea bass with crispy skin, shaved fennel, red onion, micro cilantro/fennel and olives was experimental and I appreciated the creativity with the simple ingredients. The roasted quail with bruleed figs and rosemary balsamic quail reduction was another favorite of mine. Nothing beats sweet figs and delicious quail, it is a classic winning combination. I absolutely love this restaurant and I cannot wait to return. It seems too good to be true, really. Another memorable meal engraved . . . to be continued.
HOLY MOSES PART THE WATERS GOOD. I haven't eaten this well in the Bay Area since . . . since . . .... Read more 
3 star for the food and 4 star for the service. We had a Christmas Eve dinner with friends at Quattro and the food wasn't impressive.  The service on the other hand was good, not too much but to the point, courteous and warm. We started a drink at the bar, the snacks of peanuts, dried cranberry and toasted nuts tasted great! As we moved into the restaurant, it wasn't full for the special night's meal, but there was a live harp performance.  The Christmas decos hung on the ceiling were beautiful, too bad they didn't shrine any lights on it, it would look even more spectacular. The bread basket was good.  The toasted thin bread with cheese was very tasty and crispy. We went with their 3 course menu and one of us got the 4 course.  For appertizers, we ordered all of their options, roasted diver scallop, porcini trifolati, grilled octopus and spiced marinated ahi tuna "scottato."  I loved my porcini trifolati, the mushrooms were soft, juicy and everything came together, tasty and well composed.  The grilled octopus on the other hand was overcooked and became too chewy.  I couldn't even cut it out with my knife.  I didn't try the other two, but didn't hear any oohs and arhs about it. The difference between three course and four course was an additional pasta dish, which our friend ordered a sage risotto with liberty farm's duck confit and gremolata.  The portion was really small, however. Then for the entree, two of us had the venison fillet with radicchio marmalade, chestnut puree, scamarzza and juniper oil and the other two of us had crimson snapper with smoked mussels, peper ragout and broccolini.  My friend complained that her snapper was too dry and overcooked and she didn't touch the pepper ragout at all.  My snapper was OK but definitely could be a little bit less cooked, but it wasn't as dry as hers.  The pepper ragout tasted like cooking with the Croatian ajvar sauce, which I can understand that it doesn't suit everybody's palate.  I didn't try the venison. On dessert, it seemed things just went down the hill one course to another pretty fast.  My warm chocolate pudding with vanilla anglaise sauce was completely dry, tasted like a dry muffin with lots of raisins in it.  There weren't enough sauce at the bottom to soften it up.  Then the surrounding dried figs were too sweet, lacking the refreshness completely.  The other two desserts we ordered were spiced torta ricotta with vanilla gelato and creme fraiche zuppa inglese with compote red fruits.  The creme fraiche was surprisingly good, light and not too sweet, yet with the right amount of strawberries and pomegranate. Overall, it wasn't a good quality meal for the price of $58 or $68 per person.
Of course if you are dining at the Four Seasons you are expecting a certain dining experience. And so we were at Quattro after a fashion shoe line debut party at the pool on the 3rd floor.  We went in around 9pm and were seated right away.  We ordered some drinks, as our waiter showed up right away to help us.  The drinks took a bit to get back to us, but that was okay as the in the meantime, the delightful bread basket showed up! The bread basket contained a variety of breads.  Good breads, that I couldn't stop picking up and eating.  It was accompanied by butter sprinkled in some leaves or herbs or something.  It looked cute, and it tasted good.  Also with the butter was a small option of salt or pepper which I thought was a cute touch.   Though I have never added salt and pepper to my butter.  It was cute though. For an appetizer we had their signature antipasto dish "to share" as listed on the menu.  It came with salami,  nostrano, prosciutto di parma, mozzarella, peperonata and bagna..............in other words lots of meat and cheeses and breads and dips.  Very elegant and really good meat.  Definitely something I enjoyed. For entrees we ordered the house made gnocchi, sea bass and the duet of ducks.  The gnocchi was my favorite but that is also what I personally ordered.  It came with sausage, toasted walnuts and gorgonzola.  There was a cream sauce that it came in also, and it was the perfect amount of cream to add the flavor that made the dish but I didn't feel like my plate was all cream and with gnocchi on the side.  It was delicious, perfectly cooked and with just the right amount of sausage, walnuts, mini asparagus and tomatoes. The sea bass also was great.  Soft, and placed upon a small serving of asparagus pesto noodles with some sauteed spinach sandwiched in between. Had I not ordered the gnocchi, I would have ordered the duck   duetto, which came with peaches (who would have thought?)  and a lentil pancetta ragout.  I love meat and this was definitely no let down.  Yummy. For those of us with small stomachs, if you order from the "Primi" section of the menu they will ask you if you want the full size entree version or the appetizer version.  So for the sea bass and the gnocchi we ordered the appetizer version which was still a full size that the three of us could and did share.  For the duet duetto, it was in the "Secondi" section and so we did not have the option to make it smaller which was fine as we ate every last bit of that also. For desert we had the Cinnamon and Sugar Donuts which came served with 2 bowels of  roasted banana caramel and dark chocolate jam.  There were 3 small donuts.  They were good, and sweet and the caramel and chocolate jam were good but for some reason I wasn't quite wowed with it.  I think maybe Tressa and I were dreaming about the creme brulee trio too. Great dining experience.  Food was great, service was good, the waiters were always around.  It is what you would expect in a finer dining establishment, especially one in a nice hotel that caters to business clientele. Yup if I lived in the area, I would be back.
Quattro is like a gorgeous and sophisticated woman with such a warm and engaging personality but when you finally get to the moment that counts, she leaves you limp like a wet noodle. Oh Quattro, how I wanted to like you so. What is there not to like - the beautiful Four Seasons hotel surroundings, the cozy and warm atmosphere with all the clear glass windows showing the pretty dusk sky, and the host and waiter so welcoming and personable. But when it came to the food, it was completely disappointing. Maybe others will like their food, but I felt like we were on completely different wavelength with the head chef in the kitchen. Spaghetti frutti di mare ($23 for "large" portion) - 1.5 stars - first, they used these strange thick spaghetti noodles which were much more like udon thickness than regular spaghetti. Then the noodles were way undercooked and still crunchy in some places. I cut a cross section with my knife and you can still see the uncooked flour in the middle. They were nice and redid the dish (think all they did was recook it) - it still didn't come back perfect but better. Then the rest of this dish was barely the size of a normal Italian dish, despite already being the larger portion. The scallops and calamari were scarce and not even that tasty. The two large shrimps that came with it didn't taste fresh as some parts were mushy. The frutti di mare sauce was rather thick, had some strange unrecognizable flavor, and not tasty at all. Skate special dish ($27) - 1.5 stars - thought I'd try some skate which I've never had. It's the wing of a stingray covered with a light coating on top of some napa cabbage and steamed purple onion with a big piece of panchetta/bacon on top. The light coating had the texture of cornmeal and the skate had potential. It was a thin slightly meaty texture. However, the whole thing was (1) way too salty and (2) drowned in this clear broth that just made all the pieces soggy. Sorry, I just didn't get it. I think I would have enjoyed a piece of $2 Jonathan's catfish fried with their cornmeal batter better than this dish. Chocolate souffle dessert ($12) - 1 star - the chocolate souffle was great but THEY KILLED IT by topping it with GOAT MILK ICE CREAM (which they didn't tell us until it was served). Perhaps some will find this novel, but for someone who is completely repulsed by the taste of goat milk and blue cheese, this was utterly disgusting and contaminated the entire chocolate souffle. Why couldn't you have just put on top a simple scoop of vanilla?!? So disappointed and rather disgusted. Ironically the two parts of dinner I enjoyed the most were (a) the bread basket with focaccia and these thin large focaccia cracker pieces and (b) the glass of pinot noir I got. Overall service by the maitre d and waiter was super and extremely personable. However, bus service was inconsistent just as the first time I ate there. My water glass got filled many times proactively in the first half of dinner and then it laid empty for most of the 2nd half only until I asked for more water. Also food service was EXTREMELY SLOW. I almost ate the entire bread basket waiting for our entrees as we were starving. Also the chocolate souffle dessert we ordered at the beginning of the meal took FOREVER to come. Bottom line: $110 dinner for two with extremely unsatisfying food and horribly slow food service despite a wonderful atmosphere and very personable staff. Why, oh why, do you have to put goat's milk into ice cream?!?! Quattro, you left me so limp and frustrated. 1.5 stars for the food, 1 extra star for the service = 2.5 stars.
Just like the hotel, Quattro is a gorgeous place for a business lunch or dinner with all the tall... Read more 
I went here recently with Wei H. & company and left quite disappointed.  While I still like the style and ambiance of the Four Seasons spot, there were too many little things to warrant a high rating. Yelp threw a stellar Elite party at the 3rd Floor pool area and the positive vibes from that event lasted for quite awhile.  But since then, I have attempted to return to the Poolside area for drinks and always been disappointed by the hours.  The pool area is only open on Fridays and weekends, but closes by 9 pm.  That makes it incredibly difficult to have dinner and to stop by afterwards.  In our case, we arrived at 9:15 and found the doors locked, though the lights were still on.  It would have been nice to just stroll in the area and enjoy the cool night air, even without music and bar service, but no go. We headed down to the Quattro Bar and while it was crowded, we were able to find a nice area to sit.  The staff, typically excellent, was definitely not on par this evening.  The service is usually one of the standout features of any Four Seasons and the fact this location employs 30% from the economically depressed East Palo Alto area is just another reason to visit.  I've gotten some of the best service from East Palo Altans that are happy to share their story about getting a chance with a great company like the Four Seasons and it's always inspiring. Tonight, instead of that warm and friendly service, our waitress was just another mediocre staff at an overpriced locale.  She didn't bring us menus, didn't give us time to order, and didn't smile, say hello or ask if we'd been to the Four Seasons like almost every other time I've been.  Hopefully, it was just an off night for her, but unfortunately, it makes an impression when you bring guests here. Finally, the last straw was the significantly increased prices.  In these tough economic times, it's hard to justify going to the Four Seasons for a casual drink when the costs are close to a high end meal.  We each had only one drink ($15-$20 each) and our final tab was almost as much as our extravagant dinner at La Bodeguita.  The dessert platters were priced similarly and were forgettable.  They've also cut costs with the "free" bar snacks and removed the very popular cheese sticks and replaced them with cheaper items. Overall, it was a disappointment.  Everything at a Four Seasons is always a premium but it always felt worthwhile to pay that "luxury tax" for exceptional service and standout bar items.  Without those, Quattro just felt like another overpriced pretender.
***REVIEW FOR BAR AREA ONLY*** When the Four Seasons opened in East Palo Alto, I wasn't really sure... Read more 
This place has become quite the professional dining staple for me... The atmosphere is great! Fancy, but not overly fancy. Appropriate for any sort of occasion. Noise level is just right so that if there is a lull it's not awkward. And everything is reasonably priced. But the single best thing about Quattro is the service: the service here is what all fine dining venues should strive for! I've been here on several occasions for work/business lunches and here are some examples of how well I've been treated: 1) My water glass is NEVER EVER more than half empty! I think this is spoiling me and I'm not sure if guys I date will live up to this :P 2) I was here with my team on my first day of work for a welcome lunch and my new manager merely mentioned that we were celebrating my first day. They came out with a plate that had a little assortment of chocolate truffles and had written "Congratulations on your first day!" on the plate (with chocolate sauce...! What's not to love?!) 3) They have some of the speediest lunch service I've ever experienced! I think our last lunch came out in 15 minutes after ordering - holy smokes...! Oh and the food is really good here too!
Dining outside on the patio for lunch was a delightful experience: Comfy chairs. Perfect weather. Plentiful umbrellas for shade. A wall of flowing water. Lovely staff. I had what they called the "LIGHT" Bento Box.  Is not light, but a fantastic medley of the chefs favorites.  Came with four items: 1) Shaved Beef Carpaccio, Truffled Salsify Chips, Watercress 2) Dungeness Crab and Sweet Corn Chowder, too creamy and warm for a nice spring day. 3) Housemade Basil Grilled Chicken Panino, Spinach and Maccagno Cheese, EXCELLENT!!!  No greasy hands, crunchy crust, lots of protein, and great cheese. 4) Meyer Lemon Tart, Honey Mascarpone Mousse, Bijou Compote, the filling was light, but the crust was a bit thick for my liking. They have a killer mojito here.  Order the club sandwich, great bread, and generous portions.  Even my bf couldn't pack it all away in one sitting. Creepy but cool: 3D art, walk by and their eyes will follow you. We'll be back for dinner and we look forward to many more lunches in the East Palo Alto sun.
After the Yelp Elite event a few folks invited us to go with them to 99 Chicken for an after party. We weren't able to make it cause we were both a little buzzed and didn't want to risk the drive, so we hung out in the room and made our way downstairs to Quattro. We already had an idea of what we wanted because we'd been staring at the room service menu for a while so our orders were placed as soon as we sat down. No appetizers this time around, we just got straight down to business and ordered the following: The Burger - House-Ground American Kobe, Truffle Butter, Cheese Wild Mushroom Risotto, Achadina Cheese Crumble, Marsala Reduction The burger was beyond good! It wasn't on the dinner menu so thank you for making it, I'm SO GLAD you did! The beef was tasty, there was no need for mayo, mustard or ketchup on the burger any of those might ruined the taste of the meat. I ordered it medium rare and it came out medium rare, more than a little pink the burger was juicy, moist and just friggin good! I'm now torn between a burger from St. Johns and this Kobe burger from Quattro. My wife ordered the Wild Mushroom Risotto and it was delicious! I tried it and thought, OMG this would go great IN my burger! I didn't do it though cause she'd get pissed. Service was excellent, the food was fabulous and the price was as expected. I'd go back here for sure just to have one of them burgers!
This is a review for their Holiday Tea (several Saturdays in December).  This is not a traditional English tea; the savories and sweets have a modern look and taste.  At $32 pp, this is not cheap but definitely worth the experience.  The Four Seasons is decked out in holiday decorations with fully decorated trees (complete w/presents underneath).  The Quattro has a classical guitarist during tea time. At 3pm, my 3 year old daughter and I shared an order.  This was enough for us (we even took home a few we couldn't finish).  The service was excellent!  The hostess brought crayons and a coloring book.  Our waiter offered my daughter hot chocolate and sparkling cider (in a mini champagne glass!) and I got champagne and tea with cream and sugar.  The beautiful and delicious food came quickly and our drinks were refilled before we asked.  When I asked for the unfinished sweets to be boxed up to go, the waiter made my daughter her own take home bag with a giant chocolate chip cookie.  That was very sweet! The employees outside of the restaurant (doormen and valet people) were also very friendly and helpful when we took pictures outside as we were leaving.  I'm glad we took the opportunity to do this.  Although I had expected to enjoy the food, the great service just made it that much more enjoyable.
Came over here with the girlfriend for a Christmas luncheon. First of all the atmosphere is very calm with a spacious design and cool body sculptures outside. With the pre-fixe meal, I decided to get the steak and pork rib with the antipasto for my appetizer. I thought the presentation of the food was very well done, and when complemented with the exceptional taste, it ended up being an enjoyable meal. The steak had great flavor to it and the rib was nice and tender. Afterwords, they had a nice desert bar. Some of the best were the various tarts. All in all, Quattro is a great place to take your significant other.  Just don't think that Quattro will be nice to your wallet.
Isn't there a place for sophisticated business people to go and have a simple drink anymore in the South Bay? Welcome to Quattro, the lounge at the Four Seasons Hotel, Palo Alto. When you arrive to have drinks at the lounge, ask for Noe. He will take good care of you. All the staff is excellent here, but Noe truly goes the extra mile. I grew up in the South Bay; when I come back to catch up with friends, this is my favorite spot to spend a quality night out. We sat outside under the stars on cushioned contemporary outdoor couches and heat lamps. A bottle of red wine, cognac on the rocks, with a quiet hum of jazz and down tempo coming from the "Rocoustics" speakers (outdoor speakers disguised as rocks) in the planters. What more could you ask for? The trees and back drop of the gorgeous contemporary Four Seasons Hotel, good company and drinks under the stars. They serve complimentary olives, fresh spiced nuts and dried cranberries. This is the life. Thanks, Noe. You're the best. I'll be back on my next visit.
I've been to this place about three times, every time with work. The first time, we learned our lesson because not everyone had more than an hour to kill and the ordering and food delivery took quite a long time and some folks had to leave without finishing their food. The second time we went we were sure to tell them we were a little short on time and they took our order quickly. The food then came out with perfect timing so now, we make sure to let them know we are on a time limit. When you have a set menu, the portions are particularly perfect. My first course was a beet salad with both red and golden beets. Let me just preface this with the fact that I HATE beets. I hate the way they taste like dirt and how earthy they are. I ate my entire salad without hesitation. I'm not sure how they cooked them, but they were tender and very flavorful. My second course was risotto and it was about seven bite-fulls. For something as decadent as risotto, seven bite-fulls were just enough to get the delicious taste of risotto without the guilt of eating an entire bowl! The halibut was my main course, and for a fish that is very easy to dry out it was moist and juicy, with the perfect sear on top. Now, dessert: Yum. It was a very delicious tiramisu. I've been to Italy twice and one of the things I cannot leave without eating is authentic tiramisu. This was so darn close to the real thing, I would definitely come back just for that (see my picture). One last note: When we first sat down, I was asked if I wanted sparking or still water. I chose sparkling, and for the rest of the stay I was never asked again to remind anyone and I was served sparkling for my entire meal. It was pretty impressive. I can't tell you how many times I end up getting still water poured into my sparkling water at restaurants.
My plus+one and I attended a company Holiday party at a small banquet room of Quattro.  The food was fine, although I preferred the entree selections that I have sampled in the past.  Perhaps it was the prefixe menu option, suffice it to say, it was so-so.  The wine was fine, while champagne reception was flowing. After dinner, I meant to drag my girlfriend to the bar and mingle with total strangers, but a coworker seemed to be interested in Natasha, and since I'm such a sucker for romance, I opted to stay and remain with the rowdy crowd.  Ooops, on a semi-empty stomach, I think the alcohol stirred me up.  I should have gone to the bar, but oh well. Note-to-self:  don't drink while with people at work, simply indulge during Yelp events.
I was not disappointed with Four Seasons' restaurant bar.  Styled with glam in mind, albeit 94303,... Read more 
Cougar - (see also hunt, prowl, corner, pounce). Noun. A 35+ year old female who is on the "hunt" for a much younger, energetic, willing-to-do-anything male. The cougar can frequently be seen in a padded bra, cleavage exposed, propped up against a swanky bar in San Francisco (or other cities)waiting, watching, calculating; gearing up to sink her claws into an innocent young and strapping buck who happens to cross her path. "Man is cougar's number one prey"  --urban dictionary Just an observation, but yes, that's the happy hour crowd at the fhore seasons.
One of the best all-around dining experiences in all of the San Francisco Bay Area! This Four Season's gem definitely delivers when you might not expect it.  Don't allow the hotel's convenient but odd location to turn you off or away from this incredible and beautifully designed restaurant.  The superb wine list and diverse and delicious menu is complimented by impeccable service that can only be expected by the Four Seasons.  My list of recommendations is too long to list, but not to worry, your decision to give Quattro a chance is no big leap of faith. This Palo Alto / Hwy. 101 landmark is not to be overlooked or simply driven by without at least a quick glance inside the hotel and restaurant / bar!  This is definitely a high-class hole-in-the-wall that will gaurantee to impress!
Like the hotel, the service here was fine, but not really friendly. The four stars are for the food and the aesthetics. The room is soooo pretty and really unique. You can sit in posh little chairs at the front "hallway" part of the restaurant, or at the bar, or in the dining room, or in the lovely outdoor palm tree lined patio. Food I ate while on my stay at the four seasons here: Tomato Heirloom salad: really incredible. So fresh and unique. The cheese on top was heavenly. Tomato risotto: yes I love tomatoes. This was also delectable, though the dish was 15 bucks and quite small. Traditional breakfast: fine, nothing special. I didn't like their turkey bacon Pomp: WOW! That is one loaded martini! I was truly tipsy after one of these, and it was such a good drink! Almost worth the 12 bucks. I'd drink two of these on a weekend if I knew it would affect me so well! Fried calamari: a staple, but oh so good! It was flavored perfectly! Apple cobbler: though the desserts on the lunch menu are tiny, they are only $2.50. I think that's a smart move. I don't get too fat, I don't spend too much money, and it's delicious. One star off for the prices. Nine dollars for oatmeal? Yep. You got it.
My wife and I ate here for Ol'Saint Valentine's Day 08.  They offered a fixed price menu. The atmosphere here is pretty sweet, they have cool decor like body casts, crazy back lit vases, and a large outdoor seating area with a huge fire pit.  We saw several people stand up from their tables to check out the body casts, they're pretty cool. As for the food, it was pretty MEH.  The first course was foie gras on an apple tart.  Foie gras is almost always good and it was good here as well despite the apple tart.  This was probably their best offering that evening and was in 3.5-star territory. The next course was lobster confit on top of a red-rice champagne risotto drenched in rose water.  On first taste, the risotto was completely disgusting.  My wife barely ate any of it.  I tried mixing it with the lobster meat to see what the hell the chef was thinking.  As I kept eating it the taste improved but it was still bilge.  As Chef Ramsay would say, "You're trying too hard!"  This dish was in sub-2 star land. For the main course we both had Kobe rib eye.  I highly doubt it was Kobe, so I wish they'd write what it actually is (Wagyu).  In any case, it had the marbling you'd expect and they did a decent job of preparing it.  This dish was probably pushing 3 stars but it was kind of plain in terms of the sauces. There was some dessert that my wife ate. It's worth noting that for a place that claims to be Italian, what the hell was Italian about this menu besides fresh ingredients? Service was spotty.   They had a ton of servers and might have even been pushing a ratio of 1 server for every 3 guests but they were not consistent at picking up plates and left our table waiting too long for the check. The hotel will bill you $6 for valet parking just to eat dinner, this is an added slap in the face.  Some people decided to give your hotel some business and drop almost $300 on dinner with tip and you ding them $6 for valet parking?  High class, good game Four Seasons. Let me save you some trouble, there's no reason to eat here.  If you're affluent and you like to wear a suit and use your iPhone while you're drinking a cocktail, you might like the lounge/bar area.  Aside from that, save yourself and skip this donkey.
This review is for the bar and for breakfast in the restaurant. I'm a value-oriented kind of person, and to my surprise, I found the bar/restaurant at the Four Seasons to be my kind of place. Bar: Good selection of drinks and while prices are on the high side, they are not obscene.  Plus, the surroundings are elegant, the service attentive and genuinely friendly.  I will happily pay a few dollars more to chill out in a swank environment while someone keeps bringing bar snacks over.  It's also right on the 101, so a good place to while away rush hour (that's the evening rush hour, i'm talking about, by the way). Breakfast: pricey, yes, but very nicely done.  It's a good place for a business breakfast and while i wouldn't come here too often on my own dime, there is something very relaxing about starting your day in a sunny, spacious room with gracious service.  My omelet was very good and the other selections looked tasty as well.  I wouldn't rule out  a detour here on a day when I can't quite face the office just yet.
Came here for a Saturday brunch, armed with my $25 http://Restaurant.com gift certificate (purchased for only $2, wahoo!) The ambiance is really classy, although whenever I go to nice restaurants like this, I feel like a little kid who's going to be ignored.  Thankfully, we weren't ignored.  Service was good, albeit a little slow.  We had to flag down our waiter multiple times - so he could've checked on us more. The food: - Bread basket: tasty bread & crispy cheesy flaky cracker things... with sun-dried tomato paste - Pan-fried halibut with eggplant sauce, mushrooms and some fancy gravy: pretty good - Flank steak sandwich: open-faced. Gooood. - Coffee: came with a piece of chocolate chip biscotti Grand total (including tax & tip) = $60 - $25 coupon = $35 for a good meal at a nice restaurant. It is pricey of course - so I would never eat here without visiting good ol' http://restaurant.com first.
Yum! Who knew this treasure was hiding away in the Four Seasons? My boyfriend and I went here last night for a romantic dinner before heading out to a birthday party, and we were very impressed. Though the menu is full of hotel prices (just take a look at the wine list!), the service and food we were received were truly exceptional, particularly the service. My boyfriend and I started with a glass of Pinot Grigio and a glass of the Rose. The Pinot Grigio was better than the Rose, but both were still pretty damn good. Little did I know  my boyfriend had gotten a promotion that day, though he waited for the wine to tell me so we could toast. We then ordered the hamachi yellowtail appetizer, the huckleberry and chanterelle risotto, and the ribeye. Our waiter asked if we wanted to split everything, and rather than the usual side plate deal, the restaurant actually created our own little tasting menu for us based on the three course choices. It was the perfect amount of food, beautiful plated, and everything was delicious. When we were ready for more wine, the waiter was kind enough to send the manager over, who helped us select an excellent bottle of Bordeaux. Most bottles of wine are HALF OFF on Friday nights, which is just a great deal. At one point my boyfriend went to the bathroom, and I flagged over our waiter to ask if he could arrange some kind of chocolate dessert with a candle in it to celebrate. Even better, following our dinner, our waiter brought out a plate with "Congratulations on Your Promotion" scripted on it in chocolate and these incredible warm doughnuts with a chocolate sauce and a vanilla dulce de leche sauce. Soooo good. Definitely get those if they're still on the menu. Overall, great experience, and I would definitely go back. The bar ambiance would also be great for grabbing a drink after work or during happy hour.
Oh, Quattro.  I'm going to be honest, the food is not that great.  It's often bland and boring.  the service is outstanding, though.  In my particular opinion, there are MANY better places to go for a meal. BUT the bar is great.  Somewhat intimate if you cozy up in the hall-like setting, great little appetizer menu, and wonderful cocktails.  Go for the bar, but find your chow somewhere else.
I had a weekend breakfast here - my friend recommended that I eat their "Breakfast Burrito" - but the awesome thing about Four Seasons is that it is no Taco Bell (^ ^) The venue has floor to ceiling windows and is perfect in letting in the California sunshine.  It is unfortunate that the FS is inside an office complex, which makes the hotel very sterile. But, I must say the breakfast burrito - served very elegantly - is definitely the best I have had.  It is small in proportion compared to what you would get at at taqueria, but hey, I won't complain at all because it is so neatly done.  The service here is extremely nice too.
If you ever want a bloody mary, go to Quattro. It is the best! We went for brunch and it was quite nice. We requested to be seated in the outdoor back patio, near the waterfall. That was really nice. The service is impeccable, we had at least 4 wait staff and the manager come by to attend to us. Quite nice, it was! Ambiance was definitely up there. Nice place to take a date! The food was decent, very decadent selection, but I could have used less oil on my eggs. Might not be my preferred choice for brunch, but the Blood Mary alone will have me returning. I kid you not, it is delicious!
minus one star for needs to still practice on their service. Called me Ms./Mrs. Ko when I am Dr. Yen and my husband is Mr. Ko. also, they should serve the ladies first and not just serve "around the table." pasta was good though a few dishes were salty. the server knew his wines. my husband loved his saffron rissoto generous with bread. dessert was wonderful - fresh doughnuts with dipping sauce (chocolate or banana caramel) yum! and as a freebie ender - balls of mint gelato covered in chocolate pricey but beautiful and to be expected b/c it is a four seasons and a hotel restaurant (all hotel restaurants are crazy expensive)
I checked this place out a few years ago (right when it opened) with the intention of having a Going Away Dinner for an old boss.  I had lunch there to sample the food and ordered the risotto.  It still ranks as the best risotto I've had to date (and I've tried plenty).  Very simple, but delicious!  The deep-fried squah blossom did it for me. It was the 'cherry on top'... YUM! Great decor, fabulous art pieces, very sophisticated, and classy!  What else can I say?  It's the Four Seasons, shouldn't it be all of that?
This is a very slick, stylish place.  Has a type of LA-Las Vegas feel to it. Great cocktail menu and stylish food. Food:  5/5 Drinks:  5/5 Service:  5/5   . Price:  $$$$ Interior:  5/5 Exterior:  5/5 Park:      5/5  (Garage + Lot) Go Back:  Always if you want to pay that much. Recommendation:  yess
This review is for the bar only ... I spent a few hours here while waiting for a tardy friend, and even though I haaaaate to be kept waiting, I actually enjoyed passing the time here. I sat near the retro-cool fireplace and enjoyed a delicious lemondrop martini while I indulged in people-watching and eavesdropping on conversations. It's a pretty popular place for VC deals and you never know who will walk through--I couldn't help but notice the Tesla parked out front on the way in. The staff knew I was waiting for a friend, and they were very solicitous and kept checking on me every so often. Since I was starving and my friend was late, I decided to go ahead and order something to eat. Great bar menu! Even though they'd given me olives and nuts to snack on, I needed more sustenance, so I ordered one of the wood-fired pizzas: prosciutto and arugula with crescenza cheese. I'd expected a one-person-serving pizza, so I was amazed when they brought a huge pizza that almost covered my little bar table! It was really delicious, with a thin crust, and was a great balance of saltiness, pepperiness, and creaminess! Note to self: must go back with (punctual) friends for drinks again!
3.5 stars. I came here for brunch with a friend because I had a certificate from http://Restaurant.com . We ordered the assorted pastries to share, along with the Quattro Benedict (me) and chocolate chip pancakes (her). Though my benedict was delicious, if it weren't for the certificate, I feel it would have been overpriced. Service was a bit on the slow side as well, but overall, it was an enjoyable dining experience. -L.
I liked it.  We were staying at the hotel, and I was about to eat my Whole Foods yogurt in peace in the room when my husband showed up unexpectedly and prematurely, and dragged me downstairs for lunch.  I was not gonna give up my yogurt and planned on grumpily eating it at the restaruant, but the server was gonna take care of me whether I liked it or not.  He took my yogurt, added plentiful amount of berries to it, served it to me in a bowl, and didn't charge me for it!  I am a total control freak when it comes to my food, but that was way cool! We also stopped there for dinner one night, and it was your typical dinner at a high-end restaurant.  Nothing to complain about.  A bit of upsell, but not too forceful.  Plus we were on expense account, so who cares.  I also liked the 3-D funky art.
Went there on a Thursday evening for a business dinner, just three of us. The restaurant was busy as there was a private function going on in the back patio area and some of the guests also seemed to be having dinner in the restaurant and moving freely between the two areas. Some very glamorous women there at the event and while I appreciate that our male waiter had much to distract him in the eye candy dept. and that neither me or my guests (all males in the 40-50 range) are much to look at, I would have appreciated a modicum of f**king attention. After all, am I not paying too?. Our waiter was inattentive, rude and pretentious. And he was not even that busy. The food was just ok. I am driving further up University next time. The main thing this place has going for it is the location ..... oh and the scenery :-) The Bar is a decent place to hang and enjoy a drink though.
We were bored, that's our excuse. It's a nice place, really. If I lived in the peninsula, it'd probably eek out one more star from my grubby little paws. But since I live in SF, I really didn't see anything here that would justify the drive, especially now that gas is north of $4.50/gallon! *Tangent:  I'm sure that people will be reading this review 5 years from now and laughing about how cheap $4.50/gallon gas sounds...* It's a lovely setting, and the space is large and airy.  Seemed like a lot of happy people munching on their foccacia when we strolled in.  Our server was chipper and my water glass was always full.  Food was tasty, quality ingredients, yada, yada... The downsides:  "Four Seasons prices" for a mediocre experience.  At this pricepoint, I expect a certain level of service and ass-kissing that Quattro just didn't deliver.  Inexperienced (but affable) servers, awkward pacing, missing silverware, all detracted from our experience. But I'm a generous god, if Quattro agrees to kiss my feet and feed me grapes, I'll be happy to shoot 'em an extra half-star.
Valentine's Day dinner a night early was our 6th time here.  This 5 star review is way overdue.  We love this restaurant!  We've only been for dinner so far. Every dish we've had has been stellar, and the service is very attentive, but not irritating.  The wait staff is very knowledgeable about the food as well as the preparations.  I had the Loch Duarte Salmon this time, and it was poached using a "sous vide" process.  Our waiter explained this, and he really knew a lot about it.  The wine list is varied and fairly priced.  We've also had their Sunday Supper, which is an amazing value. Definitely our special occasion restaurant.
I was invited to Quattro for lunch this week... and I was definitely pleased with the service and the food.  However, as a 20-something female, I was stared down like an alien by the middle-aged crowd of white men in sports coats.  Hey, give me some credit - I was even wearing a conservative black suit and a striped French-cuffed dress shirt... But anyways. I started with an amazing spinach and arugula salad.  It had some frisee as well, plus chestnuts and pomegranate.  A light-lemon flavored oil-based dressing covered the greens.  A hard cheese provided the ideal amount of tang.  Fantastic, and portioned perfectly.  (I always hate it when the salad is so huge you can barely tackle your main course, which was NOT the case with this salad.) The lunch special was a mahi and scallop combo plate with butternut squash, kale and brussel sprouts.  Everything melted in my mouth.  A warm fall/winter California dish done absolutely perfectly! For dessert, out came a raspberry tart and a mini chocolate cake.  Decadent. Recommended for a business lunch.  Just make sure you're looking dapper!
Ensconced in a cement and metal fortress that is the (east) Palo Alto Four Seasons Hotel...valets are friendly...spacious lobby with lots of nooks for quiet conversation...SkyMall shoe-buffer available for use in the mensroom...approaching the hostess required navigating a narrow bar area that was hopping with young soused accountants. Restaurant has a relaxed, modern ambience...there is an amazing series of four prominently displayed sculptures on the left as you walk through the restaurant. Carved into large rectangular stone-block monoliths are larger-than-life human forms...the subjects of the sculptures look like people you might encounter walking around downtown Palo Alto on a sunny day...all sporting present-day clothing and hairstyles...in addition to its artistic merit, these sculptures feature a really cool optical illusion in that the figures appear to rotate towards you as you walk past them! Entire meal had a great presentation...bread basket was a meal unto itself...the friendly sommelier was also a poet ...the first pick had just sold out...decently priced italian Chianti was a perfect choice...ordered per server recommendation: the wild boar ragu was delicious...the rigatoni was heavy on garlic in the  good kind of way...one of our party is a regular there for lunch and was able to order his usual Cobb salad thats not on the dinner menu...dessert was the finest selection of cheeses accompanied by fresh apricot compote and a chunk of honeycomb! The  food and service was so terrific it felt as if the hotel was just an afterthought. Unfortunately, usually its the other way around with hotel restaurants.
Quattro stands above the rest in the South Bay thanks in part to the mother ship, Four Seasons Hotel. In fact, Quattro is Four in Italian, get the linkage? Indeed, the cuisine is typed as Italian but it stretches the creative boundaries into California Cuisine. Hospitality and good dining are present to give you the complete package. Transform yourself from the South Bay to a more sophisticated place. That's right. Try sitting out on the patio. You will feel like you are in Montreal or Barcelona. Quattro is of modest size. It is amazing how its size is used to make it cozy and and its limitation hidden as if by smoke and mirrors. You can order appetizers sized plates or regular entrees. Appetizers are creatively aggressive which is a good thing. The entrees were fairly good. Bone in rib eye steak was a bit gristlely but flavor was good. Prices are not too out of line. Get this, they also have a pastry chef. We had housemade donuts. Crazy. It was great. I'll take that over a Krispy Kreem any day! Kid friendly? You bet. Like a first class restaurant, the staff is very good at being hospitable to your needs. Even the "lake of fire" that decorates and heats the grounds serves to be welcoming to kids as well. The fears about being overrun by VC types or suits is not meritted. The mix of people is a plus, business colleagues, couples, hotel guests, families; all are most welcome. Full bar. Cigar menu. Yup, great to see people enjoying and relaxing whether it is for Breakfast, Lunch, Dinner or just Desserts.
My bf and I went here with a http://restaurant.com gift certificate, which made it totally worth it. The food was really good, but the portions were definitely really small for the price. The service was excellent... I can't say that enough. We never felt deserted, and the manager came to check on is during our meal. I had one of the red wine flights, and the pours were VERY generous.. I highly recommend a flight if you plan on drinking wine. For starters, I ordered the prosciutto-wrapped quail, which was AMAZING. The server (who already knew we were using a gift certificate) brought my bf a complementary appetizer so "he wouldn't feel left out". awesome. For dinner, I ordered off the primi menu. The waiter said that they came in dinner portions as well, but I'm not a big eater so I ordered the primi sized Gnocchetti pasta w/ beef ragu. It was very good. Not the best gnocci dish I've ever had, but it was yummy. My bf ordered the Black Cod of the secondi menu. It was deeeelicious. I wish I would have ordered that as well. Cooked perfectly.. melt in your mouth cod. yum. We didn't order dessert simply because nothing looked super appetizing to us. Overall, 3 stars for the food, 5 stars for the service. I'd go back with a http://restaurant.com certificate.
The food is always creative and the service excellent. Have never had even a mediocre meal there. Note: Am rarely a fan of valet parking when there is parking within 50 feet of a place. That goes for Four Seasons as well as Mac Arthur Park. Do like them both, despite that.
Quattro gets 2.5 stars at best. Working in the same plaza, I've had the opportunity to visit Quattro several times for lunch and a few times for drinks after work. For such over-priced food, I had expected it to taste better.  However, time after time, I find myself glad that I wasn't paying for the meal (thanks corp america!).  The flavors are pretty bland and nothing special.  The only thing I've ever really enjoyed was a seafood risotto.  Their bread basket has a lot of variety, however, and the cheese cracker is quite good. If you call in a to-go order and pick it up yourself, you will still get charged with a 18% gratuity and service charge.  They treat the to-go order like room service. Drinks are way expensive - go somewhere else.  This place is meant to cater to 4 Seasons patrons stuck in the silicon valley with no car. Quattro's only saving grace is that the service is superb and the space is big.  But you'd expect that from 4 Seasons.
Overpriced mediocre food and VERY slow, inefficient service. The hotel and restaurant are lovely. Very chic and business like but unfortunately the food and service fell short. We were a group of 6 and our waitress was very inexperienced and knew nothing about the menu. Took about an hour for our food to come out and when it finally did it was cold and mixed up. Will go back for drinks and atmosphere, not for the food.
BAR ONLY!!!! The drinks selection is pretty good....relatively pricey but still good. I had some odd sangria concoction along with some good beers. the decor is nice....very woody.....I like wood. buhahahaha I like the patio area too...... . . . I hear the food is good.
This is a decent place with good food and great service. The prices...ouch! I'm not the kind of guy who can afford to go here every week, but the once every other month it's a nice treat. The place is genuine class (an anagram of alec guinees) with a wonderful atmosphere for comfort and business. It's odd that I have had lunch here a couple of times and never felt out of place like I have at joints like il Fornio or The Lion & Compass. The service. Holy Crap is the service top-notch. I mean they take care of you and make sure everythgin is perfection and fast and well-done. I love that. The food is only good. I can't go any further. The risotto is very good indeed, as others have noted. It's my typical order because the two times I went off the risotto and ordered something else, I was sorely disappointed that it not only didn't live up to it, it also didn't really deliver much in the way of flavor. The booze, by the way, are pretty damn good. I was glad to get a Manhattan that I thought was really good.
Our gathering was a for a friend's b-day celebration, of course, to take advantage of the "Sunday Supper" deal. The food was prepared to our expectation - decent. Service was GREAT! the only complaint - the portion is smaller than what I got before. Luckily we still have b-day cake to fill our  half empty stomach!
Came here on a rainy Saturday evening without a reservation, but we were seated almost immediately. I came wearing dark jeans, black suede boots and a black leather jacket, and even though it said "business casual" or "dressy" they weren't too strict about it. Service is a bit slow, but that's probably because I'm used to Asian restaurants where food is ordered and served much faster Our bread came in and it wasn't warm, but their crispy flatbread was pretty good.  We ordered coconut rum(amazing), gin and tonic(my university Model United Nations club signature drink) and a raspberry sparkler, plus cranberry vodka. We had the 1. Seafood Stew, Tomato, Chili Pepper, Gremolata 2. Rib-Eye, Fingerling Potatoes, Arugula, Horseradish, Salsa Verde 3. Liberty Farms Duck, Bloomsdale Spinach, Turnips, Black Mission Figs and I got the tasting menu. I can't remember exactly, but it was Tuna Carpacchio, Gnocchi, Pork/Bacon with mashed potatoes and a sweet vegetable/chocolate/gelato dessert. The beet tasted really weird with the sweet chocolate and ruined my taste buds. But everything else tasted pretty good. Good service, but it could go a bit faster as we were anxious to go out and shop :)
A very decent hotel restaurant.  Service is always impeccable, waiters are friendly, fast and efficient as one can only expect at the Four Seasons. Have stayed in the hotel several times so have eaten breakfast, lunch, and dinner here.  Generally enjoyable fare, some hit and miss items. The ambience is nice and relaxing - very clean, open spaces.  Very interesting statues line the left hand wall (they represent the Four Seasons, of course), the shadows and lighting make them appear to move and follow you when you walk by.  Take a look!
I had the prix fixe lunch here in January and again in July, and it was very good both times.  $25 for a bento-box style lunch with a poached pear stuffed with gorgonzola and greens, a grilled sandwich, a chocolate cake and a bit of soup.  Next time it was gazpatcho, swordfish, crab salad, and a homemade ice-cream-on-a-stick. The service was decent, the decor nice, the location is fine as long as you're driving (it is in the Four Seasons Silicon Valley) and Ikea is very convienient, which is of course key...
Quattro would do well to spruce up its exterior. Seriously, we passed the place twice before realizing it was in the sterile corporate park by the freeway, which almost made us turn around. Once inside, however, my co-worker and I were happy to find an airy, earthy atmosphere with a welcoming -- but not overbearing -- wait staff. None of the wines were under $10. This close to wine country, I would have expected more of a price range, since so many of the areas top bottles can be found for very reasonable prices. But at least I was satisfied with the pour, which was quite ample, even considering the glass. The waiter brought out a sample amuse-bouche -- "compliments of the chef" -- for my co-worker, warning me ahead of time that it wouldn't jive with my vegetarianism. I helped myself instead to the deliciously warm breads and salted butter, then dove into the enormous salad that I'd ordered as a side. What I most admired about the menu was the inventiveness of the ingredients. My ravioli was a unique blend of butter-sage sauce and peas and cheese that I doubt I'll ever find again, while my co-worker was still trying to decide an hour later whether or not he'd enjoyed his gnocchi or if was simply indescribable. He must've liked it, because neither of us had room to try any of the amazingly creative desserts, like almond panna cotta, hazelnut creme brulee, panettone bread pudding with lavender, and other nummy concoctions that sound worth returning for. I'm leaving off a star only because I wish there'd been more vegetarian options. If you're going to be this inventive, I want to eat it. And I can't do that if it used to have a face.
Bought a voucher through Travel Zoo and am so happy I did.  Fabulous Saturday night - date night - dinner.  Wonderful food.  Great service.  Happy diners all around.  Beautiful decor.  Nice wine list.  Great after dinner drinks.  Did I mention the fabulous food?  The only reason why I am not giving them 5 stars is the TELEVISIONS in the dining room!  TV's?!  Turned to Sports?!
3.5 stars I still find it kinda strange that the Four Seasons is located right next to Ikea in East Palo Alto. Anyway, the outside dining area is lovely on a sunny day. The patio furniture is very nice and cozy. The food was just ok for me - a little bit overrated and nothing to rave about. I had the  special of the day: grilled hamachi with rissoto. It was just alright, a bit lacking in flavor. The dessert was pretty tastey. I had a pistachio creme brullee. The staff is very attentive, though I think when my co-workers and I had lunch here the bus boy must have been new because he seemed rather lost and nervous. The food is just a 3 for me, but the ambience gets an extra half a star. If you're charging your meal on the corporate card I say go for it. =)
What I felt while walking to the john after sitting down for a meal which easily spanned 2 hours, was bliss.  The service was outstanding, the space lovely, the food presented very well, the waiter perfectly paired with our lightness of being that night - probably due to good wine.  I had a great experience, as did my beautiful girlfriend and our humorous friends. The food was good - just not excellent.  Perhaps we're jaded by fusion and experimentation by every other top flight restaurant.  This was a rock solid - yet conservative - trendy restaurant - go figure.  Or perhaps - Italian - as good as it gets - is not the hip food it was when we all thought Chinese was out there.
Quattro, you know I love you. Your fresh food, sumptous desserts, cool decor, and such a pleasant service. Oh, did I mention that I love your donuts? mmm... donuts...
Atmosphere - 5 Stars Service - 5 Stars So, What is wrong with this place? OK!! FOOD - 2 stars! All the food are either too saulty or too sweet. This is really disappointed!! I went there for my bf's brunch but we are really disappointed on the food.
We came by Quattro at the Four Seasons for a light Sunday brunch. Surprisingly it was quite empty for a 11:00 Sunday morning but we sat down expecting great service and great food. Sadly, this wasn't the case. The decor itself is quite elegant but clean & simple and I could see how it would easily be turned into a nice bar and dinner restaurant. For brunch, however, I'd recommend sitting outside on the patio. We were going to sit out there ourselves but a large party of women had already claimed the area for their own version of a Sunday brunch straight out of Sex and the City. The most interesting part of their menu was the Quattro Brunch Bento Box. The grilled swordfish with toasted brioche was tasty, but not amazing. Everything else on the menu is just what you'd find at any other place with a much cheaper price tag. All in all, not too impressed w/ a Four Seasons restaurant.
Quattro was a surprising dud of a dining experience. I went with the parents for the sunday supper. It's $25 a head and you get a choice of 3 starters, 3 entrees, and a desert platter. We tried each of the 3 starters: a boring salad, a depressing minestrone soup, and a pasta dish that was probably the best of the three. The three entree choices were spaghetti and meatballs, pizza, and chicken scallopini. My parents had the spaghettis and I had the chicken. The chicken was tough and excessively greasy. The spaghetti was too chewy and drowning in a generic tomato sauce. However, I did enjoy a few things. The homemade bread and cheese were well done and packed with flavor. The desert platter was delicious and probably the most exciting part of the meal. Service was well and attentive too. My mom is a painfully slow eater but the waiter was really patient with her. I probably will not be back. I think there are better places for money to be spent.
I had out of town guests so decided to take them to Quattro for dinner friday night. The thought is to find an elegant place but not overly stuffy like the places in the city. The peninsula location is also convenient. The food is just average. Not great. The clientele is generally educated and refined but for whatever reason the table next to us ... how should i say it ... trailer trash from east palo alto? The topic of conversation and the language used is certainly not appropriate for such setting, especially at the high decibel levels. Service is generally attentive except towards the end when all of us were still have dessert and the check came unsually early.... Bottom line: food average; nice surroundings despite the people at next table; service above average.
I went with one of my friends here to try out the food and atmosphere I had heard so much about. We were not disappointed. :) We went here a few months ago and I wish I had yelped it when my memory was fresh, but I did want to give it a good review because we really did have a wonderful experience. The decor was nice, the reverse statues of the people in the rocks was kind of odd, but as long as you didn't look at it too much you were okay. We ordered one set meal sans wine, one main dish, and one secondary dish. The set meal was VERY reasonably priced for the quality and sheer quantity of food. Oh, and did I mention the bread was FANTASTIC? Unfortunately, both of us, especially me, filled up on bread before the food came. Dahh. They change the set meal so yelping about how good the food you will never get to eat is would be inconducive to any assistance (read: not much) this review will give. haha Pros: - Such good food. Except for those Chinese-herbal olives in one of the appetizers. Other than that, fantastic! Especially the desserts. Yumm - Great atmosphere. We went at night, it is date-worthy if you are so inclined. - Attentive servers. - Yummy dessert! - Great variety. Cons: - Hard to find the door. - Awkward walking in past tables of people eating in what seems like a hallway. - Valet parking is mandatory. Boo. :( But they give you free water if you want it. Overall: I found it to be fairly priced for the food that we were served, the attention we were paid, and the experience we had. ^_^
Second baby on the way.  Not ready to do another baby shower but how about a nice ladies brunch at the Four Seasons. Pull up to the valet who offers to park my car free of charge as long as I don't give my ticket to the restaurant inside.  Like this - celebrity service without paying the cost for us common folk. Beautiful day in Palo Alto.  Open and inviting atmosphere.  Very nice but not pretentious.  Wonderful presentation. I had the egg white frittata which was okay.  But very bland.  The cheese scrapings were minimal.  A little heavier dose would have livened up the flavor. Friends raved about the Eggs Benedict with lobster.  Desserts looked delectable.  The best was the nutella toast with fresh jam.  could eat it all day. When they found out it was a baby shower, complimentary desserts flowed our way.  Try the Reverse Affogatto - coffee ice cream with steamed vanilla milk and cookies.  YUMMY!
Well, you won't be bored. First, the non-food:  ambiance& decor are modern, clean, and interesting.  Service is professional, non-obtrusive, and helpful.  Service could be a bit more refined, but they were skimping on waitstaff the night we were there. The food is anything but boring:  the chef obviously loves big, bold flavors. Amuse buche was duck liver. For appy,  I had the pea bisque, and wow, that's a lot of pea flavor.  The lobster ravioli was bursting with lobster and garlic flavors - too much for me, actually.  The lemon sorbet was lip puckeringly sour.  The date's striped bass, on the other hand, was perfectly seasoned, and her chocolate mousse desert was beautifully restrained, with a lavender gelato on the side to die for. So, in summary, a bunch of false notes for a $140 meal (plus wine) for two...  I'd have hoped for better.  Three stars for bad value for money - I thought about giving four, but since I'll probably never come back, that seems too generous.
What happened to my Quattro?!!  We went there for a Sat lunch and was sorely disappointed!  The service is still decent, but the rest just dropped an entire notch.  The chef really should go back to culinary school. The ingredients are still good and fresh.  The presentation was acceptable.  However, the food was awful.  It's not that the food tasted bad; it didn't.  But the taste just doesn't make you want to take another bite.  I think the problem was all of the dishes had no character.  There were many flavors, but none stood out.  It's like watching a movie where all of the characters were supporting characters or listening to an orchestra where all the instruments were equally quiet and playing harmonies with no melody. For example, the cauliflower soup... there were cauliflower (pureed), olive oil, red wine reduction (which really doesn't go with cauliflower that well), and basil.  You would expect cauliflower to be the main ingredient with the others helping to enhance the flavor.  However, I didn't feel like I was eating cauliflower soup.  it was a flavorful BLAND.  This was the same for all of the dishes.  In fact, I had to mix a lot of hot peppers and the sun-dried tomato paste (for the bread) into the spaghetti pomodoro sauce to bring out the flavor.  In addition, the spaghetti noodles were thick (like the size of udon noodles) and very chewy (almost like it wasn't fully cooked). The decor also seemed a bit cheaper as they have replaced fresh flowers in glass contains with plastic candle containers.  Even during this recession, I expected better from a Four Seasons restaurant. I hope my next visit (which will not be any time soon) will be a better experience. Food: 2, Decor 2.5, Service:4, Ambiance: 3.5, Value: 1.5
Quattro was a surprisingly fantastic dining experience!  Went to the US Tennis Open at Stanford with friends & we decided on giving Quattro a try.  We loved it so much we went back the following night. On both nights everything was delicious start to finish including their freshly baked bread & cheese crisps (i think they make their bread) served with a side of house made fresh mozzarella; calamari was yummy; sausage pizza w/ carmelized onions was stellar; our mains included Sardinian Gnocchetti Pasta, Kurobuta Pork, & rib-eye. deserts were also impressive; my favorite was the mint creme brulee which sat on a delicate crust fridays are 50% off most wines!  they have an extensive wine list. you may have to ask for the bar menu since that is where the pizzas & calamari are listed service was also great both nights; space is nice with indoor/outdoor dining I thought the prices were right on. this is my new favorite peninsula restaurant!
I took my family here for a special Father's Day breakfast and was extremely disappointed to say the least.  When I arrived with my husband and two little kids,  we were seated at a very tall table with chairs as high as barstools.  We asked to be reseated and explained to the hostess that the table wouldn't be safe for the kids.  She got the manager's attention but he quickly told us that there were no other tables available and that our online reservation didn't say anything about including kids.  We had a hard time believing that since the vast majority of the other tables are at a normal, low level and the restaurant was certainly not full, but we tried to make the most of it and sat down.  Soon enough, my 3-year old fell out of her chair and started crying, which got the hostess's attention.  She found us a regular table and graciously noted that she thought that the manager would have taken care of it.  Fortunately my daughter wasn't injured.  The rest of the meal was tasty, though the rest of the service was very spotty and inconsistent.  Frankly I was a bit shocked by the whole experience given that it's the Four Seasons.  Needless to say I don't plan to go back to Quattro since there are so many other great restaurants in the area.
Went once for lunch, once for dinner. Lunch I'd give 3 1/2 stars to, dinner I'd give 2 stars to. Lunch: large menu, kind of expensive but good quality, portion sizes, fast service. Got a really nice pizza, saw some other great looking fish/meat dishes. Would go back for lunch. Try to eat outside if it is nice out. Dinner: didn't really know who the waiter was (we had numerous, who sort of came and went). The person who took our order didn't volunteer any specials...after we ordered, I asked, he told us ("oh, right!") and then we all changed our orders based on that. Whoops. Dishes brought out didn't go to the right people (at $75/person excluding booze, one would hope to do better). I gave my coat and portfolio to the waiter, with the express request he help me remember both. He gave me a claim ticket. When it was time to leave, I gave the claim ticket to someone and sure enough they brought back the jacket only. Little things like this contributed to a low assessment on service. The dinner menu was TINY, although the prix fixe did look nice. I actually ordered an entree off of it without a problem. Portions were equally small...somehow lunches seem much bigger than their dinners. Very nice presentation--I got a seafood risotto. But I felt they kind of skimped on the portion size. Very pretty ambiance, good wine selection.
A superb hotel with a superb restaurant. Service in the restaurant is always impeccable. Very nice atmosphere but not pretentious. I love the Four Season signature fries.
Upgrading to 5 stars based on repeatedly excellent food experiences and service. They have really gotten their game together on the service side and continue to exceed my expectations.
Executive summary: AMAZING FOOD, but amateurish service.  Being a big foodie, I can put up with... Read more 
I just went to Quattro for lunch with a couple clients and I wasn't impressed with the food at all. I had the pasta e fagioli and I've had TV dinners that had more taste then that. It was supposed to have prosciutto in it and I think I had one little piece. The lighting and seating were good though. Tables are just far enough apart so you don't have to hear the conversation next to you. The highlight was probably seeing Steve Young there since I'm a Niners fan. If you're feeling pretentious and want to waste your money, then go here, otherwise, there's a lot of better places you can eat at.
I would give the food a 3 star, but the ambiance and service was excellent. Our server was super attentive and even gave my mother a free extra dessert. Even the hostesses were very sweet. He did smell like cigarettes though, so that was a bit icky while eating. I got the Spring tasting menu which was mediocre. I did not enjoy the chilled asparagus soup was not something I enjoyed. The mushroom pasta was mediocre, nothing outstanding and the beef was overly chewy and not that tender. I enjoyed the rhubarb panacotta and my mom enjoyed her risotto and her halibut. The bar menu actually looked pretty interesting to me and the pizza's were thin crust and looked pretty tasty. I'm not sure I'd return here for dinner, but the bar/outside lounge with heat lamps might be a nice place to visit, especially during the summer.
This restaurant offers a good example of how inattention to a few details can quickly degrade a dining experience from "great" to "so-so".   At dinner last night, the first half of the meal was very satisfying: I loved the ambience (a very modern, bustling, elegant and large dining room with glass walls and high ceilings); the wine was great (though pricey), the Caesar salad was superb, and the service attentive.  For the entrees, we had scallops and prawns "spiedo" style -- fantastic! -- and the king salmon (nicely done, though not particularly noteworthy). Then everything went downhill.  The coffee was served lukewarm, and when we finally got a fresh pot, it was of mediocre quality.  The dessert -- "molten" chocolate torta -- was disappointing.  (Note to chef: Please tone down the use of rosemary sprigs, especially on the desserts!)  Then we waited forever for the check, and another eternity for someone to pick up the credit card.  By the end of the evening, we were relieved to be leaving and uninclined to return.
Quattro at the Four Seasons in Palo Alto is one of those restaurants that I visit at least 1 - 2x/mo.  Perhaps I should have post a review sooner in Quattro's defense after reading several poor reviews.  I visited more than a fair share of Italian restaurants in SF (yes, including those well known popular places in North Beach), and most were very disappointing with below average food.  Most importantly, almost all didn't offer homemade pasta. At Quattro, the service is very friendly and consistently good.  It also has a good selection of Pinot Noir at decent price ranges.   I have tried many offerings on the menu:  Liberty Farm duck breast, seafood stew, ossobuco, quail, various fish dishes, spaghettoni, ravioli, squid ink linguine.... the pasta dishes are always excellent because they are homemade pasta with flavorful sauces!  A server once informed me that the executive chef made his pasta fresh from a pasta machine he purchased from Italy.  The duck breast is also one of Quattro's popular dishes as it is juicy and full of flavor.  The seafood stew has a decent amount of clams, mussels, and fish fillets, with rich flavors in a thick tomato broth. The next time if you happen to be near the Four Seasons in Palo Alto and looking for an upscale and great Italian meal, go ahead and give Quattro a try.  Besides, you definitely will not have to worry about spending hours looking for parking like in the North Beach!
We went to Quattro last Saturday night on a rare 'date night'. I'm generally leery of hotel restaurants but was pleasantly surprised by Quattro. The place was reasonably packed - I wont eat in a restaurant that isn't at least 1/2 full - and we enjoyed a very well mixed Martini at the bar. Once sat down out main observation was that it 'felt' like a hotel restaurant. Notwithstanding the service was very good, the food excellent although in small portions and the wine list extensive but very overpriced. Net net, we had an enjoyable evening and give it a C for ambiance, B for the food, A for the service and a B overall. We wont be going back but are glad we tried it.
My foodie friend came here for his bday dinner with Dine About Town (or one of those other prix fixe deals - I forgot).  The food was underwhelming to say the least - the entree reminded me of something bland prepared by someone learning how to cook.  Even with the three course meal, we left thinking, "now where can we go to get dessert and some snacks?"  The restaurant itself was modern, spacious, and classy inside the fancy hotel, but prix fixe meals aren't supposed to be a gimmick to get you past the doors to make money from the bar.
I'd call this place a local gym for both the restaurant and the hotel.  The bar is a happening little spot too, and they do know how to mix drinks, have good wines, and a lively business crowd. Admittedly, not all experiences have been perfect, and the prices are a little more than some paces, but overall, this is a favorite. Great food, excellent ingredients.....the downside is more likely to be the service than the food.  Spotty and not quite as professional as most Four Seasons. Some of our best experiences include: Christmas dinner party for my entire office (a party of around 15) on a Friday night.  Firstly, the food--fabulous, fresh, original, varied between courses and delicious. EVERYONE loved it! Really, one of our best dinner parties of the past decade. But the added bump which the boss loved was that there was no corkage.  This restaurant has no corkage or 1/2 off their wines on Friday nights (the restaurant, not the bar.) This meant we could open more bottles, and everyone got to drink what they liked, and the rest went home. Usually with each pull of the cork I feel a little pain in my credit card, but not here!)  I'd say this will be our new tradition. The bar makes for a fun evening out, and has very convenient freeway access.  (cabs are easy too as you're at a hotel.) The hotel is a great little local getaway--just pack a bag and stay over.  No airports, no rental cars, no stress, and if you're lucky enough to live on the peninsula very little driving. And they'll shuttle you into town. There's a surprising pool/hot tub area on the roof, so it is very relaxing. When you're up there, you'd never know you're just on the edge of a fairly major California freeway. And there's a spa and gym, for those who partake. Check out the hotel & the bar/restaurant!
Swanky yet randomly decorated hotel restaurant with pretty good food at business traveler prices. Cost to worth it ratio: 2.6 stars (bit overpriced for what you get--for both food and wine) Highlights: - Sea bass: amazing! Ordering fish sometimes can be a crap shoot and their fish here is exactly what I hope to get when I order it. This was a large, impressive hunk of moist white fish. It was light and pure due to the simplicity of the preparation, yet substantial because of its size. - Spinach fettuccine with beef short ribs: the special of the night which sounded good and lived up to that when it arrived. Fettuccine was freshly made--you could tell cause it had that softer fresh texture I enjoy in homemade pasta. Beef short ribs was an different choice for a pasta topping, but it was quite divine as a full meal: veggie, carb, and tasty meat combo. - Charcuterie platter: soft prosciutto catapulted the hub to his beloved Italy but the hard pecorino cheese was the standout fave of the table. - Donuts: looked like they would be dense but they ended up being light. The cream and chocolate dipping sauces were a hit. - Wine list: quite substantial and they had a rare Santa Barbara winery I discovered upon my last visit there, so i was excited and had to get it. - Service: good like I'd expect from a Four Seasons. Our waiter was great and helped me decide between a few choices without much hesitation. I like that in a server, as I often pawn off the decision-making onto them being the indecisive girl that I am. Lowlights (my flip side to highlights): - Clientele: we were probably the only people not on business expense - Vegetable salad: more like a full salad of greens in taking up most of the plate with a few vegetables on the top corner of the plate. When I order a salad that touts featured vegetables, I'd like a bit more than that. Squash blossom was a novel addition with it stuffed with goat cheese and gracefully placed on a crusty thin bread slice--nice play on texture and presentation. - Decor: nice on the surface but a disjointed mix of styles. On one side there is a set of artsy glass colored vases in crevices in the wall. On another side, there's 3 what I call tricky in-and-out statues behind glass a la Disney's Haunted House faces. They follow you and look either concave or convex depending on the angle. Chairs are sleek modern with black backs and cut out rectangles. Nice place that was good to try, but not so outstanding that I feel the need to go back. One thing that may get me there is the wine dinners, however. ;-)
totally improved since it opened! my parents and i went here for my birthday lunch when it first opened and we were in shock. like emi n said, not up to the four seasons standard. our waiter was bleeding in the mouth and he hand kept shaking. you can imagine how disturbed we were and how scared we were that he was going to drop the plates when he was clearing our table. BUT the I don't have a a problem at all with the yummy food here! LOVE the Four Seasons signature fries. I came here a week ago for brunch and fell in love with my pizzette. MMm and all other entrees looked so delicious. the service i must say still needs improvement. it took awhile for our food to come out. when asking the waiters for either a glass of water or a to go box, they always looked confused. a waiter poured sparkling water into my friend's cup thinking it was water ... when it was champagne! oops! thumbs up: the menu, the selection, yums thumbs down: service could be better.
I've heard such good things about dinner and normal lunch but I have to be honest, Sunday brunch was a bit of a let down. The service was nice but considering there weren't many people, it took a long time to get the food. Burger was expensive for what you get. I could name a lot of places where you would get a fantastic burger for Quattro's prices. Now the locale is a weird oasis in the gentrifying area of EPA. Obviously the architecture and outside patio make you forget you're there. Im willing to try dinner one of these days but don't think I'd be back for brunch.
The only reason this place gets 3 starts is because the inside looks interesting.   Unfortunately, the menu was not as interesting.  My husband and I went here last night and we both thought it sucked. I have to tell you, I hate living in the suburbs.  There's always a struggle to find fine dining, especially since Spago closed.  It was a Friday night and there were very few people here.  The bar was full but the restaurant was almost empty.  The place lacked warmth and the whole this was very contrived.  When we decided to go, we checked out the menu online and it was not the same menu when we got there.  The food was too expensive and very bland.  I got a spinach gnocci which was interesting but it was sitting in this butternut squash MUSH with no texture.  Tasted like very salty baby food.  My meal consisted of 3 scallops-overcooked and sitting on top of undercooked turnips.  Turnips.  That was the best thing I could find on the menu. My husband got their special-parsnip soup with carmelized apples.  The whole thing tasted like unrefined apple sauce.  Way too much apple.  Again, these were the best possible choices on a horrible menu.  His meal was ok-tenderloin with potatoes.  Next time I head to Palo Alto, I am going to Cheesecake Factory where at least you get what you pay for and it's the same every time.  Or, I am investing some drive time and heading to Kokkari. I still can't believe how pretentious the menu was.  They tried way to hard to come up with unique combinations of food but it just didn't come out right--any of it.
Beautiful restaurant with a clean, modern look. Food quality could have been a lot better considering the price. The food wasn't memorable, which is why I don't even remember what I ordered. However, I do remember that the tuna tar tar isn't bad (although the portions are tiny. Tiny meaning, one bite per person haha). Their entrees were so-so. However, their mint creme brulee was pretty delicious. Slight mint flavor, crispy and warm. If anything, the dessert was the highlight of the night. Service is good here too. Probably won't come back here since the food wasn't memorable enough.
I've been here for Sunday brunch and weekday lunch and both times I left feeling uninspired.  Don't get me wrong.  It's quite a nice place for a business lunch or even a date.  Nice atmosphere, good service, and not too expensive.  For Sunday brunch, they gave us a little jar of cookies on our way out.  But the food is just OK.  It's good, but definitely not great, and totally not memorable.
We came for Sunday brunch with a group of friends, but the wife and I found the meal less than impressive.  Having never been to a Four Seasons Hotel before, I found the decor and ambience to be very classy and modern.  And of course, for group get togethers, it's often about who you dine with and less so about the food.  My wife and I both ordered the frittata and found it bland and very unsatisfying with meager bits of salmon on top of it (and unfortunately, it wasn't even good quality salmon).  Despite having potatoes folded into the frittata, we were craving some bread or something to go along with it.  We both agreed that we could have made a much better frittata at home.  We did order the donuts for dessert and that was fine.  Service was good, but not as great as you might expect from a high end hotel.  Surveying the bar, I spied a decent selection of whiskey and cigars, so I think this may be a place to hang out and have drinks, but be forewarned about the food for Sunday brunch - you're coming here for the location.
gorgeous ambience - check! inspired offerings - check! convenient location with free parking - check! good service - hrm... i don't know if it was our server's fault, but service was quite slow.  he was friendly and knowledgeable enough, and granted, our party was about 10, but on a wednesday night?  come on, four seasons, i know you can do better!
Came here for mother's day "brunch" at 6:15 pm; it was a prix fixe menu and my selections were limited to 1 as I am vegetarian, but the food was fantastic and the wait staff was very attentive.  Had a polenta french toast with a truffled scrambled egg and a mushroom risotto, both of which were fabulous, and when my son fell asleep in my arms at the table, the waiter was careful to whisper his questions to us about how we liked the food.  They were very accommodating to children (had a basket of toys for them to choose from in addition to the standard four-crayons-and-a-coloring-book you get at places that are genuinely kid-friendly and whipped up mac & cheese for our table and spaghetti & hot dog for the one next to us) and very attentive to our needs.  The only reason it isn't 5 stars is the price -- it was over $200 for us to have 2 adult meals, a cocktail and 2 glasses of wine in addition to the mac & cheese -- but I don't think we got ripped off, the food was really spectacular and their pastry chef is divinely inspired.  We will almost certainly come back.
This is a great place for a business lunch.  It's conveniently located in The Four Seasons, right off of 101 at University, which is convenient for folks coming from SF and other parts of Silicon Valley.  Besides that, the food is good too!  There's a good selection of both light and not-so-light options for lunch (I'm partial to the calamari caesar salad or the fish and chips).  The patio is lovely when it's nice outside, and otherwise the inside is interestingly decorated.  Service can be a little patchy in my experience, but it's always friendly.
I expected more, really.  the Miro books in front caught my eye, and got me excited for brunch, plus the fact that we had been awake since 8am and weren't eating til 11.30.  I was jonesing for a good cup of coffee, and expected a premium blend of darkly roasted goodness from this place, given the Italian heritage.  Not so.  the coffee was slightly watery and less than i would imagine at $4 a cup. I immediately spotted the Raspberry, White Chocolate and Mascarpone Stuffed French Toast.  When it arrived, 10 minutes AFTER the other 5 dishes at our table, it was not in fact stuffed, it was glued together with a frothy raspberry marscapone foam that was unsatisfying.  The french toast itself was too bready and lacking character.  Another member of the party ordered one of the Breakfast Pizzettes which had nothing to do with breakfast as far as I could tell, since they were 12" thin crust pizzas.  Pizzettes in fact that had HAIR on them. The servers were gracious after we pointed out their errors, but having hair on food at the fours seasons is unacceptable and having a 'mix-up' in the kitchen and completely forgetting my order is intolerable.  Even more so since there were a total of 15 people in the entire restaurant. I hope for their sake that I had an anomalous experience, since I won't be going back for the sterile surroundings and poor food.
Oooh I love Quattro. They have the signature Four Seasons bread basket which almost ruins my appetite every time. They always have a nice selection of seasonal soup and really great pizzas. I usually try to stay away from the heavy pastas and I generally get fish. As far as restaurants go on the Peninsula, this is one of the best.
I'm not a big fan of big American-style breakfast, so I often went to Quattro time to time.  Their breakfast used to be pretty good, but is gradually getting quite average.  I was there last week for the first time in a year, and was disappointed by the quality of food they serve. South bay breakfast is not as good as the one served in Mayfield Cafe at Town & Country.  I would go there only for really early breakfast when other alternatives aren't open yet.
faux classe...over priced. pretentious menu. Had a melon "gazpacho" that had an oily taste. the pizza was soggy. The Caesar salad was large... but with an obvious bottled dressing... one at Denny's would have been as good.. However, it's a good place to meet.
Though oddly situated in mini business park across from the Swedish colony of Ikea and Hwy 101. This was my 1st time here and it's very nice! Good open space, outdoor patio could be nice with usual peninsula weather. Had the carpaccio of beef with grana padano shavings, Fresh arugula with pieces of black truffle. Primi was the lobster and butternut squash risotto with a sweet leek sauce. Both were very good. The risotto had good -sized pieces of lobster and not padded with too much risotto. Attentive service and they had black napkins (though inconsistent from the hostess. Some people wore black but had white napkins). PS-order a pasta dish. Their cheese grater is really something!
Always great service and great food!  Their risotto is legit!  It gets very busy during the week around lunch time as they experience a rush from the surrounding offices.  Definitely worthy of a visit to see whats new on the menu!
One word that best describes this little secret - Classy. Inside the Four Seasons Hotel (right off the 101, very convenient!), it's is a great happy hour spot if you are hoping for drinks after or during a business meeting. Had I not been invited to Yelp Drinks! 2011 and been introduced to this little gem, I probably never would have heard about it. Very much a business crowd, the bar is classy and modern, a great place for a first date - a nice atmosphere, but quiet enough to have a conversation. There is also a fireplace as you are walking into the bar, outdoor seating with a gorgeous view of the fountain, and a restaurant that I will have to try another time!
I did not at all like the service by the waitress that was waiting on us! She was completely unfriendly and kind of rude. The one star is because the place is gorgeous.
French Toast and Eggs Benedict is fantastic! How can you NOT like The Four Seasons?! We absolutely loved eating breakfast here everyday during our visit back to Bay area.
Today we went to Quattro for brunch with a total group of 6 family members. All 6 of us agreed never to come back. Most of the food was inedible, as there was always some overpowering taste in every dish. Too sour, too salty, very fishy, too much mint. There was also some awful, obnoxious techno loop that went on for 10 minutes. The server was kind enough, but he always managed to forget something while describing a dish. For example, on my uncle's dessert platter, he only described 6 out of 7 items. On the Hamachi "teaser" he described everything but the sauce. Another issue was that a man with a cart asked if we would like bloody marys at least 5 times during our meal. Not everyone is hungover... Anyways, the best part of the meal was the hamachi teaser with a citrus sauce. the sauce was much too sour. Most of us ordered the soup of the day, an artichoke reduction. The serving size was small, and it was also extremely sour. It was a chore to eat it. My uncle and dad ordered the set brunch, which for some reason came with two rigatoni dishes. The first was the pasta e fagioli, which they said was a little soggy and had a very bland taste. I ordered the Sage Honey Roasted Salad with Squash. The term salad can be used very lightly , considering that there were about two forkfuls of flavorless greens. There were two tiny rings of squash that were awful. The biggest problem was too much mint, but there were lots of strange flavors that did not go together. Maybe someone switched the labels on the spices. There were also 4 lightly breaded croutons that were warm and soft but were so salty that i couldn't eat more than too. I barely could touch the figs as they were so strongly marinated that it almost knocked me out. they also tasted awful. By this time, my stomach had started to feel strange, as i had many different extreme tastes. My uncle's "Taste of Winter" a seafood rigatoni had a very strong fishy smell that the whole table could smell. I tried a shrimp, and it turned out to be very fishy and much too salty to be finished. He also had desert samplers with vanilla ice cream, a toasted chocolate hazelnut bread, cantaloupe soup, a ginger, basil, and one other thing pudding,  and a donut of some sort.  He decided that the best part was the ice cream. I tried a bit of everything, and trust me, it wasn't good. We also ordered ice cream which was full of chunks of ice. I probably will never go back unless its for the bar.
When Ceana and are I stumped as to where to go for lunch....occasionally there appears a devilish grin... "Quattro?" "uhmmmmmmmmmmmmm...Sure why not!" It's pricier than I'm accustomed to spending for lunch but I think it's worth it.   Just ignore all the people engaged in shop talk. The food is GOOD! I've had the margherita pizza....VERY fresh ingredients and I loved it. Sorry Little Caesar, there's a new pizza in my life now.  I have grown up taste now  : ) and more than 5 bucks in my pocket. Next time I'm going to be bit more daring and maybe try a panini!
wow what a disappointing experience! i treated my mom and brother for mother day brunch/dinner. the dinner was a fixed menu @ $68 a head, drinks not included. I expected to be served a  fabulous culinary feast that would tantalize my taste buds. what i was served was a disaster. i gave them 2 stars because the servers a pleasant & polite. Also, their desserts as always were phenomenal!!! but other than that.... i had the asparagus bisque soup....it was ok at most...it seemed to be missing the ooumph i was expecting... their fresh pea risotto was again...just ok my bro had duck ravioli, he didnt like them and said all he tasted was the balsamic vinegar. he said his lamb entre was ok, he didnt seem too thrilled either my mom had the lobster tempura, which was really good, but i felt bad for her as she suffered trying to eat her seared bass that look wayyyyy over cooked. the disaster arises in the main course. i ordered a rib eye tiger prawn combo....for starters...those wernt tiger prawns, just ur normal prawns... the steak, the so called rib eye, was about 4 oz. and was only the dry center round cut of the rib eye. their first attempt at serving me the medium cooked rib eye failed...it was cooked all the way through...dry n tastless...i sent it back. the 2nd dish that came back was RAWWWWWWWWW still flesh colored in the middle. I sent that back too....i didnt eat my main course. now the bill came. i looked and noticed they charged me. i called for the manager and asked her how after i sent the plate back twice they had the audacity to charge me. after waiting 10 minutes she came back and told me the deducted $28 from my bill, the cost of the piece of steak. instead of ripping her head off on the spot i figured id just yelp her. Now ive dined at quattros before and have enjoyed it quite a bit, but the dinner we got was the equivalent of a poorly catered wedding at your local Marriott. im super disappointed. stay away from this place for special event menu's ur better off at the cheesecake factory up the street. oh and btw, the bill  for 3 people with tip came out to about $300 even after the discount and ruined dining experience. and we didnt even go big on drinks.
I love this place!  One of the best culinary gems in this area with a beautiful setting and spectacular food.  My husband and I always go here 1X  a year for our anniversary and we are constantly impressed with the delicious food, service, and ambiance.  I would highly recommend this restaurant!  Very yummy flavors!
Once again - this is the 5th time - a mediocre meal and mediocre service at Quattro.  This was a business dinner - entertaining out of town clients - and the meal got off to a bad start when we asked the waitress for 2 more minutes to choose and it became 20 minutes.  The manager had to take the order. Tonights "chicken scallopine" was lightly breaded and fried and tasted like a cross between mozzarella sticks at TGIF and chicken at KFC.  The gnocchi was bland, the fish was fishy and the steak was just a little bigger than a matchbook. At $470 for 4 people - including wine - you just expect more.  All 5 times I have eaten here I think "that was mediocre" and tonight, again, I felt I needed to share it with Yelp.  It's too expensive to rest on its Four Seasons laurels - even if they are out of season.
Just wanted to let people know about a GREAT little deal we stumbled on for those on the Peninsula. We just got back from a family "Sunday Supper" at the Four Seasons Palo Alto.  It is a great deal for a special, pleasant night out with DELICIOUS food at Quattro, the Four Seasons Restaurant. Every Sunday night starting at 5:30 PM, they offer a $25 prix fixe 3-course meal for adults while kids PAY THEIR AGE (a 2 year-old pays $2 for a 3-course meal, etc).  They had coloring books, crayons, highchairs, cute cups with straws, for the kids.  Plus they gave each kid a small stuffed animal and cute plastic "silverware" to take home. We are stuffed with leftovers in the fridge.  It is a bit pricier than some other family friendly restaurants, but we treated it like a "date night" without the extra cost of babysitting.  The exquisite food and subdued ambiance made us feel special and the kids were entertained with all the stuff they gave us. Here is the website: http://www.fourseasons.c... Definitely highly recommend it! P.S. I am not affiliated with the Four Seasons in any way, just wanted to pass on a good dining experience.  ;)
My review is one for the bar/lounge only.  10 of my girlfriends had a girls night out there where we got together for happy hours.  Although the bar & restaurant was quite crowded, our server was very attentive (e.g. w/ drink orders, bringing us utensils and the check) throughout the evening (from 6:00pm - 9:30pm on a Friday evening).  The lounge area is not big but very comfortable and cozy if you are able to hijack the sofa sitting.  The Chardonnay I got was great (it's $9/glass ... pricey, but that's the way things go at the Four Seasons).  The Cesar salad that we shared had fresh lettuce, thoroughly tossed with creamy and flavorful dressings.  The location of Quattro is very convenient (e.g. right off 101 on University Ave) to get to.  Perfect happy hour location esp. if your guests are coming from all around the bay area.  Last but not the least, the decor is gorgeous and warm.  This is a definite gem in the rough-and-tumble East Palo Alto. P.S. The -1 star is due to the steep check.  Every appetitizer or drink (e.g. cocktails, wine by the glass, etc) at the bar/lounge area is around $12/each.
Nice ambiance in lounge area.  Spacious and cozy enough to mingle with a large group.  Lounge/bar menu items were slim, no variety.  Drinks were good, but pricey $$$.  Didn't have dinner, as we wanted to check out downtown Palo Alto, which was nothing compared to the city of SF, even being a weekend.  May return to this place if friends have gatherings/events there, perhaps trying brunch next time.
Dad and I didn't feel like going out for food so we went downstairs to have a late-ish dinner here last night around 8:30PM.  Service wasn't quite up to 4 Seasons standard in my opinion but definitely not bad.  Food was really delicious and you can pretty much make any changes you want to what's on the menu as long as you ask.  I had the summer vegetable minestrone soup to start and the spaghettoni as my entree.  The bar seemed to get pretty crowded by the time we were done eating but I'm not sure if it was just one big group of people that had come together or not.      Chairs were super comfy :)  Didn't care much for the decorations.
Okay 2 stars for a Four Season's restaurant...yup and I'm very serious about this.  I used to live right around the corner from Quattro and have been there for appetizers and drinks only, dinner, and a wedding. The wedding reception that I attended (was a bridesmaid for) was great fun, but then again when aren't they?  It was discovered that the bartenders for the function had no problem upselling the liquor during the open bar which was disappointing as you would think my friend's family was spending enough already and that the bartenders didn't need to gouge them anymore. Drinks here are good (usually) and the wine list decent just really over priced and the cocktail waitresses and bartenders are no where near as refined as you would find at some of the Four Seasons other locations or even near by restaurants like Zibbibo or Tamarine.  Although if staying in the hotel and not wanting to explore near by, cheese and wine at Quattro wouldn't be a bad choice at all.  Just pick your own wine without the help of your server as I have found maybe one out of the bunch has a sense for what they are talking about.  Both my hubby and I have done our sommeliers training and he's completed his certificate...we know wine, and have heard some pretty ridiculous things out of the Quattro staff's mouths.  Except for when they had Chae (spelling?) working as their manager... he really knew his stuff. So here's where the 2 starts comes into play, the food.  It's just not that great and in fact I have sent so much food back to this kitchen I have given up.  Chewy-Chewy-Chewy octopus, steak tartare that was more like hamburger meat, and some awful oysters one brunch.  I did have one GREAT meal here when they first opened so I kept waiting for that experience to happen again.  It is never going to unfortunately and I refuse to give them more of my hard earned cash when there are so many far better restaurants just down the road in Palo Alto.
The Four Seasons practically wrote the book on service and you get this in spades at Quattro.  Portions are substantial and the food is well prepared.  Nothing uber-creative but sometimes that is not what is important.  Very reasonable price makes this place a winner.
Very beautiful setting but unfortunately the food doesnt live up to it's surroundings. Its not awful, just very average. Am going back there again next week for a business lunch(clients will love the ambience) so hopefully it is better.
Been here twice for bday lunches. Service was awesome, the place is beautiful, dining outside is awesome on a nice beautiful day. Food was pretty good. If I need to take someone on a business lunch, this is always on my list of places to consider. Located right off the freeway so it is easy to get to without having to go all the way into Palo Alto and deal with the traffic down University.
Brought the family for the Sunday Supper special.  A 3 course meal for $25 per adult and the age of the child for those under 18 so that sounded pretty good.  Was expecting something up to Four Seasons quality.  Found it pretty disappointing. Started with pear and arugula salad with pecorino. Pears unripe, rock hard and flavorless. Rest of ingredients fine but surprisingly lacking any real flavor. Spaghetini and meatballs were ok, but again tomato sauce had no zing and was oily.  Grouper entree was a nice piece of fish, cooked well but oversalted which really made it less than it should have been.  Kitchen needs to taste the food they put on the plates, add some acid, and test for the freshness and balance the good ingredients should deliver.  Service was very good, but couldn't overcome the food.   Overall this was not up to expectations.
This is a great place for brunch. I ordered a combo which comes with two eggs, hash brown, beacon and grilled vegie. It was perfectly cooked with great presentation as well. My friend ordered her favorite banana crepe which they have taken off from the current menu, but the chef made the accommodation for us. The service and the settings are also five star as the restaurant is part of the four season hotel.
What a gem! It opened relatively recently. We went for a birthday, and the SERVICE was great. Even the bartender wished the person Happy Birthday!  Also, our server was extremely knowledgeable and gave great recommendations. The appetizers and dessert were impressive, but the entree's lacked that special WOW taste.  The bruschetta appetizers were nicely presented.  My duck entree was slightly dry and could've used more flavor.  The banana split was such a creative treat! (You'll see what I mean) Overall, the food would be 4 stars, but the friendly service makes up for it.
The food here was pretty darn good, could have a little bit larger selection but it's tasty for sure.
One can expect the Four Seasons standard quality of hospitality here, perhaps just a little less polished, however it's still a great option right here on the Peninsula.
I visited Quattro for a work-related breakfast meeting. Quattro is in the Four Seasons hotel, which is a little tricky to find in the morning before a cup of coffee. There's free parking and it's easy to find a spot, skip the valet. The restaurant is bright and airy. The dining room is well decorated. I got the sense that it was partly a Silicon Valley see and be seen place for executive types. There are a bunch of law firms within walking distance of the hotel so that could be part of it. The waiters were on top of everything, presenting and clearing plates efficiently and quickly. I'm sure it was pricey.
The food was overpriced, someone showed some a buffet style meal for Easter for which we assumed it was a buffet style brunch and it was not. I was very disapoointed. The food was tasty just 240 for two people without a seafood buffet.
Quattro is located in the Four Seasons Hotel. The place looks really nice and the food is awesome. THe first time that i came here I had the Sweet pea Risotto and the was really good and i had all their different flavored creme brulee.. Soooo Yummy. The secod time i went there, i ordered the KOBE beef burger  with motzerella, they let you choose what kind of cheese to put in there... yummy... i loved it.... they change their menu here all the time and i would def. come here again
Had lunch there and had the pesto chicken ceasar. The food was decent. The decor was awesome and the staff was very attentive.
The decor is pristine, light, spacious and modern -- I especially recommend the table for two by the fireplace -- but the service was surprisingly slow and the food was just A-OK.
When it was announced that the Four Seasons would rest in the land of Whisky Gluch, I thought, "Eww gross".  I could not imagine a Four Seasons experience at 101 and University.  However, it is actually a pleasant experience.  Its restaurant, Quattro is lovely, perfect for dining and socializing. The food is nicely prepared, tasty, albeit faintly average.  I have tasted nothing so fabu at Quattro that would give rise to the happy dance or clapping "Hercules, Hercules" a la Mrs. Clump.  Admittedly, as faintly average the food ~ this is becoming my hangout/ lunch/brunch place. When you want to get away and you only have an hour or two, stop by Quattro.  Its atmosphere is an astonishing treat.  You will truly forget that you are on 101/University Ave., across from Home Depot and Ikea.  You will leave refreshed.  Dine inside or on the patio under the umbrellas.  Nibble and drink at the bar, at the other patio or in front of the fire.  The prices are unusually fair for a Four Seasons.  During Sunday brunch, a jazz group plays on the patio.  Do not expect Chirs Botti or Joe Sample! Incidentally, if you earnestly enjoy a fantastic libation, or two, the bartenders WILL have you clapping "Hercules, Hercules".
This review is for lunch only. I used to work at a law firm in the area, and this was the standard place to take potential recruits for lunch. NOT because it was actually good, though--just because it has a fancy-ish atmosphere, was close to the office, and was dependably fast (so people could quickly return to their work). I've never had a dish here that was truly good. Fish and chips are ok (not nearly as good as Cook's Seafood in Menlo Park), pasta dishes are barely passable (overcooked or bland or strangely flavored--something always seems to be wrong with them). I've heard dinner is better, but I can't vouch for that personally.
The first time that I went to the Four Seasons for lunch, I fell into culture shock. It was just another day and I was dressed in my pull-on fleece pants and a flannel shirt.&nbsp; I had forgotten what it's like to be dressed up and go out to a nice restaurant! Everywhere I looked there were well-groomed, sleek people. The restaurant itself is nicely decorated. Glass, earth tones, subdued decor. Very nice, mildly minimalist.&nbsp; Luckily, the service is excellent, which means that nobody commented on my clothes. The Cobb Salad was very nice, except that they'd chopped the lettuce pieces to the size of a quarter. Very strange. The waiter told me that every salad there was chopped fine (teeth problems in their target market?), but that I could ask for larger pieces of lettuce the next time. Fast forward to the next time.&nbsp; I looked at the menu and was pleasantly surprised to see that there were a lot of things that looked good. Lots of paninis, salads, good lunch food.  I ordered a blackened fish salad, and dutifully remembered to ask for bigger pieces of lettuce. OK, here's a tip:  The blackened fish salad ($19) is served with cabbage, which is best in the smaller pieces. The food is excellent, well-seasoned, and I'll go back.&nbsp; Good iced teas. Despite the large salad price, many items are in the $12 to $15 range, if I remember correctly.   My favorite item here is the Turkey sandwich.  If you have the time, this is a lovely restaurant. I'll make that even stronger.  This is the nicest, most refined and romantic restaurant for lunch in the Palo Alto area.  (The second best would probably be Evvia.)
Everything you would expect from a Quattro in the Four Seasons.  Great food, solid wine list and great service.  Oliver, the sommelier, is great and knows how to suggest a great pairing.  I often eat at the bar which is never a problem.  The short rib sliders are pretty damn good.
My review is based on the food, wine and service, not the price, as this was a vendor lunch. Service:  Excellent.  Attentive and knowledgeable staff, took care of water, place settings and wine in a professional manner, consistent with typical 5 star hotel restaurants. Wine:  (cough, cough), two bottles of 2004 Stirling ($175 each).  So good... Salad:  The Arugula Salad was probably the best I've ever had Pizza:  Yes, I went to a 5-star hotel and had a pizza on the vendor's dime.  But it was Friday, and I had a craving.  I had the sausage pizza.  Very well prepared, thin crust and very fresh. Dessert:  I had a chocolate mousse, which was light and fluffy, with fresh cream and some fresh brandied cherries. A great restaurant, as long as I don't have to pay :-)
What a great experience...much better than I had expected.  My daughter and I went for a light dinner.  The hotel entrance is beautiful, and the bar is lively.  The dining room is beautiful and classy.  We had a simple meal of the appetizer and first courses.  She had a chilled carrot soup and I had a yellow tomato soup.  I asked the waiter how much cream was in the tomato soup, and he said a little.  He noticed I waivered, and he had it brought to me with no cream at all.  Both soups were luscious.  My daughter had a ragu and I had the cannelloni.  The taste of each was superb.  Additionally there were two types of hearty bread served with olive oil and balsamic vinegar.  We were so full on this we ended up bringing some of the meal home.  The service was more than excellent.  The waiter held my chair out when I returned from the restaurant, brought me the soup with no cream, and two other restaurant people (managers?) came around to ask us how our dinner was.  We had not spent a whole lot (no big entrees, no drinks), but we were treated like royalty.  What a nice evening.
Despite a somewhat sterile by-the-highway location, Quattro is beautifully appointed, as you would expect for a restaurant in a Four Seasons. The food is very nice (though better for the meat/seafood eaters than us vegetarians). Service is remarkably un-rushed. Great desserts.
I have been to Quattro many many times because it is a great location for business meetings. I do not think there has been one dining experience that was ever 5-star service. The waiters are generally unprofessional, get the orders wrong, are not attentive and don't have a clue how to be an upscale service provider. The food is mediocre for the price and some of the entrees are the size of appetizers. I am also surprised that in the Silicon Valley the restaurant does not have some healthy salad options. I just don't get it.
This is a beautiful venue to have a romantic Sunday Brunch but as I saw the rest of the guests, there were also families with children. My waiter, Peter gave us exceptional service as did the Manager, Brian Easely.  I always take note of people who give outstanding service.  I ordered the curry spice, grilled sea bass on top of saffron risotto.  The flavors were very interesting and highly euphoric!  My husband had the Kobe beef burger and that was fresh, delicious, and prepared pefectly.  Appetizers and dessert were also excellent.  The atmosphere was beautiful and we ate outside close to the waterfall structure.  The staff was more than helpful in getting umbrellas for you if you had too much sun.  I highly recommend this restaurant for anyone who is a foodie.  Excellent food, service, and atmosphere.  Listen to Peter who suggested the Chef's special.
AVOID IT LIKE THE PLAGUE!  It was the worst dining experience I've had in a very long time.  It was so disappointing, considering the 4 Seasons hotels are held with such high caliber.  The food was good, but the service was horrendous.  Between asking for water and getting charged $7 for bottled water, asking for champagne and getting white wine, asking for apple juice and getting orange juice, asking for a grilled cheese sandwich with fruit on the side and getting two pieces of cold bread, cheese on the side and a basket of fries, wow, I could go on. What a poor dining experience.  I mean, we could have gone to a diner, paid half the price, and gotten better service than what we received yesterday.  Don't you just hate experiences like that where the service ruins everything, even though the food is good?
We normally go here for happy hour and its been a great place so far ... cozy, nice wine list, good appetizers/bar food, helpful and attentive staff.
After a lengthy business stay @ the Four Seasons, I decided to have my last dinner in Palo Alto at Quattro and boy did I make the right choice! As single diner, I opted for a seat @ the bar which was buzzing and Danica, the bartender did not miss a beat in making me feel welcomed right from the get go. My choice was the English Pea Risotto, followed by the Kurobuta Pork entree and capped by a delicious Banana Split Quattro style. I really don't know why I bothered venturing out so much during my stay, hunting for ultimate flavors to justify being in the most exiting culinary region of the country when all I had to do was press the lobby button on the elevator. Kudos to Quattro and the Four Seasons for the best dinner I ever had anywhere in the Peninsula!
The restaurant is beautiful. The service is outstanding.  We ordered the pre- fix menu that is offered on Sundays. The food was ok. I was expecting something better  from such a fine establishment.  Maybe I should have ordered from their regular menu.
Don't go...it's the worst food in the Bay Area. My friends & business associates have had lunch at Quattro's 3 times in the past 7 months.  The most recent was 10/14/08. It's amazing that the average rating would be so high.  Every time I eat there the food gets worse and worse.  I keep trying to give Quattro's another chance and finally have given up.  None of the people I have gone with will ever go back.  This restaurant must have the worst chef in the bay area and the price is ridiculous for the poor quality and taste of the food.  If I was the 4 seasons, I would be very embarrassed. I have eaten at many restaurants from very pricy to very cheap, and I haven't found one this bad anywhere else.  As sad as it is to say, the food at fast food restaurants is much better.
Been here twice for lunch.  Once on business and once for a personal celebration.  Sure it's a bit expensive, but there aren't many areas on the Peninsula or in the S. Bay serving this level of cuisine with this great ambiance.  I love love the light that comes into the dining room and the view of the great California modern terrace. On my most recent visit they surprised us by bringing out a special dessert platter with delicious dark chocolate truffles to accompany the dessert we'd ordered.  I think our lunch bill was around $80 for two for two courses, sparkling water, 1 espresso and 1 shared dessert.
For the bar only: I've had an alumni networking event and drinks with coworkers here, and the drinks were good, if pricey. Service is great, and the bar area is very interestingly designed. It seems like a nice place for the older/business crowd, though a man of my years may find it good cougar hunting, were he so inclined.
Our server was so friendly and the food, though on the small side, quite rich and flavorful.  They do a 3 course $25 Sunday dinner so that will probably be the next time I go back...
I've had a great experience scheduling business lunches at Quattro. The food is always good and there is always a good selection of different types of entrees.
i want to give this place 5 stars, but my $100 bill both shocked and saddened me.  this review is for the bar. i come on a friday night.  it wasnt super crowded and the weather was right so i got a table outside.  there was some nice music playing from fake rocks and i had a nice view of the fountain.  they brought out some snacks, olives, cheese crackers, and a really nice.. nut assortment where half of it wasnt nuts.  i got a glass of really good ice wine which wasnt ont he menu(though the only filled my glass half way which kind of sucked.. last of the bottle) and my friend ordered a remy, which turned out to be xo.  i orderedsome calamari and i think that was it.  the calamari was good.  the waitress was delightful, although she almost dropped our whole tray.  overall, it was a really great experience.. the staff was not uppity at all.  i cant say that the patrons are the classiest people though.. mostly people on business, in business suits but i didnt feel the need to get dressed up at all (i was in cropped denim, a tank top and flats).  i saw one woman topple out of her chair and crawl on the floor.  it was shocking.  but i guess she needed to unwind..
The ambience and service was wonderful and very gratious (the best service I had in awhile), which makes it so hard for me to give Quattro a low rating; however, the food was not up to par.  The bruschetta was enjoyable, but the baked chicken was so dry and lacked flavor.  I'm willing to give it another try....
My husband & I and my parents visited on 8/8/10 for my father's birthday.  We enjoyed the appetizers, alcoholic specialty drinks and entrees we had until about an hour after we left my Dad fell terribly ill!  We took him to the ER later that evening because he couldn't keep water down he was so ill.  Luckily after getting re-hydrated they concluded he got food poisoning from the seafood.  He was the only one to have both the diver's scallop dish and the fisherman's stew.  Note: He is NOT allergic to any seafood!  I haven't seen him this ill in years.  My Mother has frequented this location before in the past and was shocked to see there to be some serious issues with their seafood.  Clearly that was the issue.  I left a comment to them on their web site but never received a SINGLE response from them----for 4 seasons that was pretty BAD!  We were not staying at the hotel, we live in the Bay Area.  My husband and I do not plan on returning to that location for sure, especially since they did nothing to compensate or apologize!
great location. beautiful place that's all
beautiful dinning room, excellent service ... two stars for my Turkey Club sandwich that was made with processed "deli" meat. I would expect fresh / natural meat at these prices. Very disappointing.... I find it hard to believe that guests at a hotel of this caliber would accept  meat of this quality.
Great food, nice atmosphere. Service was good but could have been better. Minor issue: in the list of wines by the glass, there was only one Italian red.
I came here with my date, and it was one of the better dining experiences I had in a while... The ambiance was nice, even though the crowd could have been a more "fun" group. Most of the people there seemed to be the techie-types, sitting at the bar w/ their drinks in their business attire... or, at the table with their suits on and talking up a storm about their individual accomplishments, etc... Although I wished they weren't as loud, the actual dining here wasn't bad at all. The server was friendly and knowledgeable, and she seemed attentive to us. The menu is full of the typical stuff you'll see at the upscale restaurants, with their array of steak, fish, and pasta... but, it was the dessert menu that was the most attractive. Their mini donuts were freakin' awesome, and the cannoli was nice!! All in all, the restaurant was a good experience, and aside form the annoying techies that were fairly loud, the food & service was great! Parking was pretty hectic, though... so, unless you're open to valet parking, you may have to walk about 2-3 blocks length from the lot to the entrance...
My family has had lunch and a dinner at Quattro.    The lunch service was slow, but the food was excellent, whether is was a simple stripped bass fish and chips or the Kobe flank steak.    The dinner was good, but inconsistent.  I had the chef's fixed menu, which I totally enjoyed.    My wife had the Grigliata Mista, which she thought was OK and I thought was rather good.   I think her overall impression were tainted by a slice of apple that was especially sour from vinegar.   My daughter had the Crispy Baked baby chicken, but is uncooked at the bone.   We had to send it back.    We went ahead and had our desert.   They comp'd us two deserts and send us home with properly cooked chicken.   So I give them points for standing behind their food and service.   Otherwise I would have ranked them lower.     The most consistent part of the meals we've enjoyed is their deserts.   We've never been disappointed with the deserts and we've six or different ones.   The service was excellent, which what I expect for a premium restaurant. We've recently been back with eight other friends, including a foodie, a chef, and pastry chef.   Everyone enjoyed their meals.  It was a social dinner, reservations at 6:00 and out by 10:00.   It was a long dinner, mostly due to us, but also due to the leisurely pace of service.  So if you are in hurry, this not the place.   If you want attentive service, excellent food, and place to enjoy the company of your party this is the right place.  I bumped them to 5 stars based on this meal.
This place is such a cool surprise!
Quattro gets 5 stars for how responsive the Four Seasons and Quattro management (President Jim FitzGibbon, General Manager of East Palo Alto, Tracy Mercer and his staff) were to my initial rather negative review of the restaurant. They contacted me right away and were extremely responsive to my comments. I just returned from a wonderful 2 hour lunch there with the General Manager. In addition to enjoying the food, I appreciated the fact that we discussed in concrete terms ways in which service, quality, proportion of food, could be improved. We even talked about price points! The fried calamari was fresh this time and the tuna tartare was divine. I also really enjoyed the sea bass, an item I tried for the first time. I had a bit of the risotto with duck confit and it was also delicious. It appears that the chef had even made attempts to improve on the vegetable salad which was still on the menu. We talked about the correct proportion of risotto for the price point. The coffee and biscotti were excellent, as always. I truly appreciated how gracious everyone was at Quattro today, including Alessandro Cartumini, the Executive Chef, and really how willing they were to give due consideration to my suggestions and comments. I will definitely go back to Quattro and would recommend it to my friends! For those of you who have not always had the best experience there, I would suggest that you give it another try because the managment and staff seem really committed to positive change.
I have now eaten at Quattro five times since April and I can't say that I am thrilled by the food.... Read more 
